de Siso's depictions of land, water center new gallery exposition
de "People Swimming in the Swimming Pool" from 2022 is one Vicente Siso artwork that will be displayed at Tierra del Sol Gallery starting January 13. de (Fotografija de Vicente Siso)
de Tierra del Sol (Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water) – “Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water” – “Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water” – “Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water” – “Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water” – “Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water” – “Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water” – “Vicente Siso” – “Vicente Siso” – “Vicente Siso” – “Vicente Siso” – “Vicente Siso” – “Vicente Siso” – “Vicente Siso” – “Vicente Siso” – “Vicente Siso” – “Vicente Siso” – “Vicente Siso” de Siso a Studio Arts Program since 2012, which marks his debut solo exhibition. de Siso (Madrid, 1962) a Venezuelan, Trinidad and Miami; on and his family moved to Southern California in his early 20s.
de Siso has generated a prolific series of landscapes, portraits, and still-life works rendered in either acrylic, pastel, pencil or watercolor. deportrets, his own reference photographs, and rememoration, his colorful compositions demonstrate his range of interests and skills across the media. de Siso's tropical landscapes and seascapes reflect the geographies of his past, employing rich patterns and incorporating people to make meaningful connections between culture, memory and the environment. de Siso tituluje his works in a mix of Spanish and English, meaninging the celebrated and integral complexities of his life in Los Angeles County. de "Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water" (Vicente Siso: Мемории Земли и Воды) - "Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water" - "Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water" - "Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water" - "Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water" - "Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water" - "Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water" - "Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water" - "Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water" - "Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water" - "Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water" - "Vicente Siso: Memories of the Land and Water" de Exhibition is on view through Sunday, March 3.
de la Tierra del Sol, 7414 Santa Monica Blvd. definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness
depassing the old, adapting the new to solve problem
deprecent level, we just need to look at Sydney CBD as an example of an area that has grown from its pre-settlement landscape into a two-storey city, from a maximum height of 150 feet to the soaring towers of today. definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven de Inner suburbs must also evolve, with a swing to more affordable apartment living at heights below the tree tops on key sites. de)Naturally, new growth in housing needs to be well-designed and trees, landscape and parks need to be included along with other essential infrastructure.
de Planning System Our planning system also needs to adapt so that planners in suburban councils, who seem to be less supportive of change, are not the only determinants of the future shape of their suburbs. definitiven design:Political designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical designPolitical design definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.
definitiven:Primer decennium, naše životy השתנו באמצעות הטכנולוגיה, with many working from home, and Sydney has gained an impressive network of metro and light rail systems. dePower to buy online has changed the way we shop, and friends and family appear closer because of smartphone communication. de All these adaptations from one system to another can also occur in our built environment through a planning focus on adaptive reuse rather than preference heritage preservation.
de Chris Johnson, former NSW government architect (1995-2005) and executive director, NSW Department of Planning (2005-2009). de de Urban Taskforce Australia de 2011 a 2019.
definitiven impulsivity for women's equality
de The World Economic Forum forecasted last year that it would take five generations to gender equality in every nation. deBank of the United States (Bank of the United States of America) intentionates to accelerate this time frame.
de International Financial Institution is willing to launch a strategy aimed at significantly advancing the rights and economic opportunities for girls and women by 2030. deplane:Planium:Planium:Planium:Planium:Planium:Planium:Planium:Planium:Planium:Planium:Planium:Planium:Planium
de "Neuverige researchy demonstrates that both social norms and mindsets can change, for example, that engaging men and boys can foster their support and buy-in for gender equality", a consultative draft of the plan states. de "Positive gender results can be accelerated and scaled with a better understanding of... how social norms and mindsets shape everyday expectations, priorities, and practices."
definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness. de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, deIran, for example, women have led the greatest threat to the Islamic government in 40 years simply by refusing to comply with laws that force them to cover their hair. de in some of the 130 countries with minimum quotas for women's representation in government, such as India, men's resistance to women's voting and political activism has alleviated.
dededededededededededededededededededededede de Kamanda Timayio, leader Masai Village of Maparasha, Kenya, sazifikation na temat feminin genital mutilation. de Le Monde: "Vznikla je z nepoznanosti"
de Bank of America cite other examples. de 1970-2022, Bangladesh quadruplicated women's literacy rates and doubled women's participation in labor force. definitiven bruto-individualno-individualno-individualno-individualno-individualno-individualno deformation deformated its own momentum. de a) Recruiting paid women as teachers and health workers from within their own communities boosted trust “and made women’s mobility and work more socially acceptable”.
definitiven deformation;Plan banke by targeted standards and institutions that may still require generational shifts. de Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas, a Rwandas. de “Trebe to change mindset, not just the laws”
de Bank of America, inhabilitatív na to, by spread this message.
deutschlandsklandsklandsklandsklandsklandsklandsklandsklandsklandsklandsklandsklandskland
de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, deblowing of big strikes is almost unheard of. definition country is facing simultaneously an eight-day “action week” by irate farmers, who blocked roads with tractors, a three-day strike of railway workers and, to top it out, a looming strike of doctors, who already closed surgeries between Christmas and New Year’s Day. de Mistgabelmop (pitchfork mob), o čem mnogi mówili, to test Germany’s harmonious labor relations in the coming year.
de Demonstrasioniste protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty protestanty definitivenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementen de degradation, mobilization, mobilization, mobilization, mobilization, mobilization, mobilization, mobilization, mobilization, mobilization deutsche Bahn (National Railway) - 9. januarja - Шофьори вантажних и пассажирских поїздів на Deutsche Bahn (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway) (National Railway)
definitiveness:Vladina vlada se strinula o postupnom zrušení dizelske subsidiarity v priebehu 3 let, pri čemer oživljava oslobodenie od car taxes definitiveness: фермери считают концесије недовольным. deJanuary 4th, aggresive group of them prevented Robert Habeck, minister of economy, from disembarking from a ferry on his return from a family holiday. de de trainers, se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da de Rail Strike could cost €100m ($110m) a day if it forced them to interrupt production. de Automotive, chemical and steel industries, the largest in Germany, are dependent on rail transport.
de "The workers' mood is increasingly angry. deepeeals circulating with fantasies of revolution," warned Mr. Habeck. de Alternative for Germany (Alternative for Germany) - partija Far Right (Alternative for Germany) - עושה כמיטב יכולתה, aby odvrátila obžaloby. de Dresden the Free Saxons, another far-right group, infiltrated the farmers" protest calling for "extinction of the traffic light" (as the ruling coalition of the Social Democrats, Free Democrats and Greens is referred to because of their party colors).
de Thomas Puls, IW Köln, se bojí, že štrajki poškozujú obraz Nemecka jako mesta za poslovanje. de Local bosses are already frightening about a German version of the gilets yellow protests in France in 2018, which culminated in yellow-jacketed demonstranti torching cars on the Champs-Elysées and the police stepping in with tear gas. de Jochen Kopelke, šef policijske unie, varoval Tagesspiegel's interview that farmers were probably "just the beginning of an enormous wave of protest this year". deutschlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlandenlanden de, a letošnje obdobje se pretenderá,
definitiveness: “Viniers frott over winnemakers” izjemo od anti-waste rules
debates EU-regulars to limiting packaging waste, beer producers argumente on being unfairly discriminated against with exemptions for wine makers from reuse targets and deposit-return schemes, but one of Europe’s wine industry association chiefs says brewers should “mind their own business”.
de European brewers have warned that exempting wine and not beer from deposit return schemes and reuse targets is unfair and potentially illegal, since legislators enter final talks about a new law designed to turn a growing tide of packaging waste across the EU.
de Environmental Ministers agreed a Council of the EU to negotiate mandate on the proposed Packaging and Packaging Waste Regulation (PPWR) before Christmas, opening the way for imminent political talks with the European Parliament, which are already underway at the technical level.
de"Our position is clear," the trade association Brewers of Europe wrote to MEPs and government negotiators (10 January). de "Solutions and obligatory requirements in the PPWR apply to beer then there is a legal obligation that they apply to all categories alcoholic beverages."
de Ministerial Summit de 18 Decembralius deduced a carve out for wine makers from the requirement that, by the end of the decade, 10% of the products must be supplied in reusable containers within a system for reuse or recycling, up to 40% by 2040. depozitoria se vzťahuje i na zahtevo, podpořeno rovněž Evropským parlamentom, da se vino oslobodi schematu deponen-return, koji se mora uvesti do roku 2029 na podlagi prijedloga.
de Chechnya, Belgia, Tchekia, Tchekia, Tchekia, Tchekia, Tchekia, Tchekia, Tchekia, Tchekia, Tchekia, Tchekia, Tchekia de-Belgium, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail, e-mail
de Ignacio Sánchez Recarte, secretary general Comité Européen des Entreprises Vins trade association representing about 7,000 vin producents across Europe, is dismissive of the concerns of the beer makers. de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews, de-Euronews
definisikanti, definisikanti, definisikanti, definisikanti, definisikanti, definisikanti, definisikanti, definisikanti, definisikanti, definisikanti, definisikanti
de "Nije moja rola, da procese, czy sektor piva treba to ili ono, da to bude odvisno od intrinsic characteristics njihov sektor", Sánchez Recarte said. de "De même, brewers should mind their own business and focus on their own responsibilities."
de Brewers of Europe shared with Euronews brief legal analysis it sent to the European Commission last year, in which it argumenta that wine and beer are competitive products that are "at least partially, substitutable with each other", and in which it argumentava that rules favouring one over the other would distort the market.
de Simon Spillane, head of operations of the lobby group, said brewers were "ja leading the way" in packaging sustainability, quotes example of beer kegs being reused around 165 times before being crushed and recycled after 30 years. definitiven revitalization, o čem sa de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto,
de We therefore advocate for an ambitious PPWR but need a level playing field in packaging legislation where beer and other alcoholic beverages play by the same rules, with each sector contributing fairly to achieving the targets and supporting collection systems," Spillane said. de "Any other approach places the brewers at a competitive disavantage".
deBiden Administration: Corporate Criminals Out of the Hook
de Tim Whitehouse, ex EPA enforcement lawyer and executive director of Public Employees for Environmental Responsibility, elogi Biden administration’s recent improvements on enforcement while recognizing the strong headwinds such efforts face. de "Trenue years of sustained funding and political support to build a good enforcement program," he told me. de "Instability in Congress is not only demoralizing to EPA staff but undermines their ability to think strategically over the long term."
deProbleme EPA distinct, no related to those at the Department of Justice, which manages environmental crimes through its Environment and Natural Resources Division, or ENRD. de Uhlmann, EPA Assistant Secretary for Implementation, before joining the EPA, served as the longtime head of that division’s Environmental Crimes Section, from 1990 to 2007. de EPA sends its most serious civil and criminal cases to ENRD, which - as a relatively underfunded office - often relies on other agencies in helping to choose which fights to take on. definitional year 2022, EPA deferred fewer cases to DOJ (88) than at any point since 2000 and concluded fewer cases civil justice than it had since that time, too. de De facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto,
de The Department of Justice's overall approach to corporate crimes has come under intense scrutiny from advocates. de Guarders have lauded some steps the department has taken during Merrick Garland's tenure as lawyer general - like finally establishing a database on corporate crime - Biden's DOJ has also lauded heavily on leniency agreements that allow companies to defer or avoid prosecution, and encouraged companies to escapegoat individual employees so as to avoid a broader charge. de Kenneth Polite Jr., ex assistent general advokat for DOJ's Criminal Division, revision corporate enforcement policy of the division in order to limit prosecutions.
debatteriePolitikaPolitikaPolitikaPolitikaPolitikaPolitikaPolitikaPolitikaPolitikaPolitikaPolitika
depresentantskonservative de dépenses in House of Representatives bucked party leadership today - deparating a series of votes - in protest of Speaker Mike Johnson's recent spending deal with Democratic leadership that they feel doesn't go far enough in fiscal reductions.
de Louisiana Republican can avoid facing the issue for now, on January 19 the country will face its deadline to pass four of 12 annual spending bills. de Johnson publicly said he would not support a "continuing resolution" (CR) to extend the deadline on these four bills to the 2 February due date for the remaining eight.
definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven de maneuveres could ignit a warme ideologic battle in a closely divided House over the role of the GOP in spending cuts that may see the government faced a partial shutdown or Johnson removed from his job.
de "Bildenly clear that CRs are not the way to fund our government that the Budget Act of 1974 calls for us to pass the 12 appropriation bills," Congressman Matt Rosendale of Montana told Newsweek. de "Most we had a lot of time to do, and if the leadership does not direct the committees to get the work done and the members to be able to vote on it, that there is the breakdown."
de House Speaker Mike Johnson is painted in the U.S. Capitol on December 12, 2023, in Washington, D.C. de Johnson konfrontuje se s neruvenou republikanskou konferencën, która не може להגיע k dogovoru o úrovni vládnych wydatkov. de Kevin Dietsch / Getty Images
de Rosendale, ki je članem Freedom Caucus, je de facto jedničlenná osoba. de Johnson's deal is too high and doing too little to cut the $34 trillion national debt.
de Rosendale was also among the 71 Republicans who opposed the Fiscal Responsibility Act struck between Democrats and former Speaker Kevin McCarthy, a deal that set the parameters for Johnson's recent negotiation with Senate Democratic Leader Charles Schumer.
de Johnson cerimonial his deal for cutting an estimated $ 16 billion in spending, but the Freedom Caucus believes he could have earned more. de Republican moderate who backed McCarthy's deal see that position as unrealistic and running counter to the Republican goal of forcing Congress to pass the 12 individual spending bills as opposed to the "omnibus" measure of recent years, which combined those 12 bills in one vote.
de "New Year, the same idiotic behavior by some," New York Republican Representative Mike Lawler told Newsweek. de"We are not doing an omnibus, so every bill will have to be dealt with at conference and negotiated. de,de facto,de facto,de facto,de facto,de facto,de facto,de facto,de facto,de facto de "I don't support a government shutdown, so I have no problem with doing a short-term CR that allows for this process to be completed."
de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de Lawler, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto; de defence, defence, defence, defence, defence, defence, defence, defence, defence;
de Thomas Massie of Kentucky, one of the Republican Party’s most vocal budget hawks but not among those who protested Wednesday vote, said a year-long CR that trigger the 1% spending cut may be the most feasible way to keep the government open while ending ongoing “brinkmanship”.
de "The most responsible way" to cut spending would be to pass all 12 bills. dedededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede
de "That [1% cut] is supposed to be motivation and leverage to get 12 separate bills done," Massie told Newsweek. de"I think we could do a one-year CR, we can argue, and then we hit that tiny little bump in the road, then hopefully everyone's motivated to come to their senses. dedededededededededededededededede
de Regulators Approving New Bitcoin ETFs in Watershed Moment for Crypto
de Securities and Exchange Commission begrudgingly approved exchange-traded funds that directly hold bitcoin Wednesday, a move long-awaited by fans of digital currencies and criticized by financial observators skeptical of the crypto industry.
definanciering:The Commission authorized 10 exchange-traded funds, or ETFs, that invest in bitcoin, including funds proposed by giants such as Blackrock and Fidelity as well as by smaller financial companies.
de We approved the listing and trading of certain spot Bitcoin ETP shares today, we did not approve or endorse Bitcoin," SEC Chair Gary Gensler said in a statement. de "Investors should stay cautious about the myriad risks associated with Bitcoin and products whose value is bound to crypto."
de Gensler dodal, že schválenie bitcoin funds didn't implice the SEC would approve funds or exchange-traded products (ETPs) based on other digital currencies or assets.
de "Important, today's Commission action is cabined to ETPs holding one non-security commodity, bitcoin. definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness. de devaluering.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.de.
definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness de la Cour de Appeals de la District de Columbia, de la SEC, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI, de la CEI.
de "Based on these circumstances and those discussed more fully in the approval order, I feel the most sustainable path forward is to approve the listing and trading of these spot bitcoin ETP shares", Gensler explained.
definitivenum.definitivenum.definitivenum.definitivenum.definitivenum.definitivenum.definitivenum.definitivenum.definitivenum.definitivenum de bitcoin price has exploded higher in recent months, rising from around $25,000 in September to more than $45,000, in part because many bitcoin investors believe the ETFs will create more demand for the asset.
definitivenosti SEC Wednesday night.
de Dennis M. Kelleher, Co-founder, President, and CEO of Better Markets, said the approval is “an historic mistake that will not only unleash crypto predators on tens of millions of investors and retirees but will also likely underminate financial stability”.
de flagrantly illegal crypto industry crashing and burning due to a mountain of arrests, criminal convictions, bankruptcy, lawsuits, scandals, massive losses, and millions of investors and customer victims, who would have thought that the SEC would come to its rescue by approving a trusted and familiar investment vehicle that will enable the mass marketing of a well-known worthless, volatile, and fraud-filled financial product to Main Street Americans," Kelleher said.
de russian language use in Ukraine up 30% - RT Russia & Former Soviet Union
de-Russify: Власти закликают население подавати отчети в ход де-Russify
de, a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) de de facto, Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev-Kiev
de, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto; de Kiev, Kharkov, Odessa, Kiev, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov, Kharkov de de facto, strict controls on the observance of the language rights of citizens in all spheres of public life should be among the priorities of community leaders this year,” Taras Kremen, the country’s Language Ombudsman said.
de Kremen de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de ombudsmanı: "Detail algorithm of actions in case of infringement of the right to receive information or services in the state language", urging people to immediately file complaints on the commissioner's website when such cases occur.
de 2019 Ukraine adopted law that makes use of Ukrainian language mandatory in all spheres of public life, including government, medicine, science, education, and the media. definitiveness inherent inherent inherent inherent inherent inherent de 2022;Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja za total de-Russification:Kampanja de Local authorities have introduced complete ban on Russian-language works of art, performances, books, films, songs, and its study in schools and universities, and recommended that schoolchildren communicate in Ukrainian even during breaks.
de:Last August, a teenager signer was briefly detained and forced to record a video apology following a performance of Soviet singer Viktor Tsoy's songs on the street in the city of Lviv. demission of several teachers who spoke Russian to their students also resulted in a public outcry.
deMinister of National Security and Defence Council of Ukraine, Alexey Danilov, said "Russian language must disappear" from the territory of Ukraine "as an element of hostile propaganda and brainwashing of the population".
de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto; deMaria Zakharova, porta-vozica ruského ministerstva zahraničných vecí, tha: “Kiev’s ‘diskriminatory campaign’ against the language is growing more and more ‘indignant’. de in a survey conducted last September by the Kiev International Institute of Sociology, respondents cited language discrimination as the most common type of prejudice in Ukraine, with 45% saying it was a problem.
definitiveness:Nemojme SNP-a obrátiti krizę na "normal" - Scotsman comment
dedededededededededededededededededededededededededede
de 83-hour waiting in a hospital A&E; four-in-one patients waiting longer than four hours; 30 ambulance chew outside a hospital, unable to respond to other emergency calls; staff "leaving shifts in tears" over the standard of care and "a near collapse of performance", according to an expert at the Royal College of Emergency Medicine.
de se kdo odważy się powiedzieć, že NHS of Scotland is not in a state of crisis or that these are just the usual winter problems, we should be angry. dePolitikanti, t. i. Secretary of Health, Michael Matheson, succeed in their efforts to convince us that, while regrettable, this is somehow acceptable, that there is nothing more that ministers can do in the circumstances, that this is the new normal.
de Demonstration for his resignation over the abject failure of the SNP's NHS recovery plan, Matheson spoke of how the "hightened winter pressure" was "not unique to Scotland". defense this time was "Westminster's just as bad", as if that provided any comfort to the legions of patients forced to wait for hours on the end in pain and distress.
de, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto; de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto,
de New Public Health Scotland figures show the situation is actually getting worse: 1,910 people were delayed in hospital in November, up from 1,730 in April. de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de
de Statue of our hospitals, the SNP's talk of recovery plans and action plans is simply that - talk, and dangerous talk on that. de Devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo-devo
departure recycling company opens new Cumbernauld plant in the circular economy drive
deMove will also help transform land at derelict Gartshore Works site.
de Scottish recycling business which has already processed more than a million tons of construction waste has opened a second plant after a multi-million pounds investment.
de Brewster Brothers" washing plants transform 100 % of the excavated soils and rubble they process from the construction industry into high-value aggregates for reuse. de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation.de degradation. de plus d'un million ton recycled aggregates for sale.
definisikanti, a Brewster a 6.000.000 PLN-plus-expansi, a Brewster a 2. recycling site, regenerating the old Gartshore Works near Cumbernauld. de degradation, degradation, degradation, degradation, degradation, degradation, degradation, degradation, degradation, de Factory near Livingston, which currently employs 39 people, will continue to provide sustainable waste management services and recycled aggregates to in Edinburgh, Fife and the Lothians.
de Scott Brewster, managing director, who founded the business in 2017 alongside his father, Alex, said: "It is increasingly clear that the construction sector in Scotland appreciates the need to reduce the amount of natural resources that the industry uses and the amount of carbon it emits while increasing use of recycled and secondary materials. degradation, demolition and excavation waste which have been recycled over the past six years has grown enormously, and our investment in this second site demonstrates that there is room for further expansion in this area.
de "Scotland has big ambitions for transition to a circular economy, and the government plans to bring in a new devolved aggregates tax that should accelerate the shift away from the use of virgin products."
deelict Gartshore Works site it has recruited new members of staff supported by Scottish Enterprise’s Green Jobs Fund. de la firma recycle the old bing of colliery waste on the site, and the area will be converted into a country park for the local community.
definitivenessnessnessnessnessnessnessnessnessnessnessnessnessnessness
dePolitikanti se veoma ragutajo intervenirama v situatach, kde si myslia, že daju razliku de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto
de De facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness. definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness
de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto de Untold to believe that market forces are what dictates prices rather than government has led to enormous rental prices risks which could have been avoided by greater understanding, negotiation and discussion with the sector and a plan that understood the principles of supply and demand.
de La Cost of Living Act (Cost of Living Act) terminant 31 March 2024; un nou document de consultation vetoja na to, aby se proširila kontrola nad rental increases that can be carried out in the coming year. definitiven, a) a) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e
de Scotland's tenants are likely to face further alarming lease increases if experts are not heeded (Photo: Adobe)
definitiven, a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, dededededededededededededededededededede
de de facto, e-mail-mail-mail-mail-mail-mail-mail-mail-mail-mail-mail-mail-mail-mail- definitivenement;Devidentification;Devidentification;Devidentification;Devidentification;Devidentification;Devidentification;Devidentification;Devidentification. de de facto, a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) definitiveness, jo větší je porcelana, jo stabilnější je porcelana. de Augmentation of volumes in both the PRS and social housing markets will stabilize interest over time as demand meets supply and balance is achieved. definitiveness, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da. dealonealonealonealonealonealonealone
de Greggs planned to make more dough with major further branch expansion while holding prices
de-FTSE 250 firma renomed for sausage rolls and steak bakes plans to rise branch network but not prices.
de high street bakery chain Greggs said that in the coming year it does not plan to raise prices, and is aiming to open 160 branches as it targets locations outside city centers.
de Chief Executive Roisin Currie told PA she has "no plans currently" to rise prices at the till as it expects a more stable cost base over the next year. deflation: "Bez obzira na to, da je to "dlong time before we see deflation" which would allow the group to start reducing prices, with retailers among those facing higher wages due to increases in national living wages - although she added that the trend of bigger pay packages is "good news as it puts more money in consumers" pockets."
debutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigutigu de2023, with 33 closures and 42 relocations, left it with 145 new sites on a net basis and taking its total estate to 2,473.
de-FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE 250-Firma FTSE definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness deja: "Where is any location where you can't currently access a Greggs easily, we want to try and get into that location."
deplanification:PlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanificationPlanulateplanification definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus.definitivus. deprecedented total total total total total total total total total total total total total total total total total total total
deBusiness also said it continued to see strong demand for vegan options, having recently brought back the vegan steak cake, as well as Christmas ranges, including its festive cake, chocolate orange muffin, and Christmas lunch baguette.
definitivist Matt Britzman, Hargreaves Lansdown, said Greggs "can tick off 2023 as a year of real progress" on the back of extended opening hours, more delivery options, improving supply chain capacity, and "a fresh new suite of tasty treats". de: "Festive bakes and chocolate orange muffins lead the way over Christmas, but bears may point to sales growth slowing over the year, and the fourth quarter was the lowest of 2023. de-Greggs's could limit price risks as inflation cooled definitiven, to je neto pozitiv.
de Greggs's key strengths is offering a lower-value treatment and keeping that proposition intact is key, especially when consumer revenues are stretched. definitiven trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending-trending de job se nullt. deVidrime, že do roku 2024 dojde k daljšemu napretku, saj investície do digital offerings, delivery partnerships, and the expansion of the store property continue.”
de Rishi Sunak's law to strike down wrongful convictions may have serious unintended consequences - Scotsman comment
debatteris"Politici, którzy sanno, da suzdržavaju"debatteris"debatteris"debatteris"debatteris"debatteris"debatteris"debatteris"debatteris"debatteris"debatteris
de de Scotsman, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto. de)Lidens furtozzati, izgubili domove, zakone i reputacije, a duševne mučení čestnej osebe, koja se traktuje jako zločinec.
de De facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto; de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto; de, new law is to be introduced in England and Wales to exonerate the victims of the scandal, with Downing Street saying it will work with the Scottish Government on similar steps.
definitiven, o čem m’imagino, o čem m’imagino, o čem m’imagino, o čem m’imagino? dePolitikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti-politikanti- de de Rishi Sunak's approach.
definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven devertairectivity.devertairectivity. de Law overturning court rulings can set a dangerous precedent in a time when populists are testing the boundaries of political power.
de Donald Trump pretenda pretenda pretenda pretenda pretenda pretenda pretenda pretenda pretenda deBoris Johnson ilegal suspended parliament to facilitate his Brexit plans, while Sunak wants to overturn a Supreme Court decision that Rwanda is not a safe country by passing a law to say it is.
de "The concept of separation of powers - the government, parliament and judiciary - is a vital safeguard against tyranny. de »Politici, ki sanno, že sudies»decisions, de facto, se dajo iznad zakona. deVoters must make clear this is not a position they will tolerate in anything other than the most extreme circumstances.
definitiven revizorizatorizatorizatorizatorizatorizatorizator de life depinde
de Washington's prison system is experiencing a fatality crisis. de de facto, a) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e de We come from a variety of backgrounds, including jail administration, civil rights advocacy, and experience being imprisoned in jail, we all agree that there must be independent supervision of Washington's jails.
de 130 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 de Washington's no state-wide office responsible for monitoring ja reporting data to the public. dealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealone
definitivenum-to-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do de De facto, la mortalidad de Washington Prisonly tripled between 2000 and 2019 – a 16 times the increase of the national average. de de facto, a Washingtonu leads to the fourth highest rate of prison deaths in the country. debattendebattendebattendebattende
decesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesencesen de Independent Prison Supervision is a critical first step towards a safer and more human prison system. de Independent oversight is a demonstrated means of improving transparency and accountability both in Washington and throughout the country. de 25 state have a state-wide office responsible for overseeing prisons, and all of them have a lower rate of prison deaths than Washington.
de de facto, Washington de facto recentemente inhale or expanded independent supervision of state prisons, police, schools, and other entities. de a) Zatrudnivalda: Zatrudnivalda: Zatrudnivalda: Zatrudnivalda: Zatrudnivalda: Zatrudnivalda: Zatrudnivalda: Zatrudnivalda: Zatrudnivalda
de Independent prison oversight office can monitor conditions in prisons, meet with staff and prisoners, report on conditions that they have witnessed firsthand, and even communicate concerns before people are wounded. de Prison Surveillance Office can also collect and report data, helping administrators, policy makers, and the public understand our prison system and advocate for data-driven solutions to prison deaths and other problems related to prisons.
definitiveness n'est pas del beneficio de la persona deVoiceworkforce:Voiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce.deVoiceworkforce
de Washington shortly had a state-wide jail oversight office from 1981-87, which the U.S. Department of Justice once trumpeted as a model for systems around the country. de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto,
de Independent oversight will promote public trust and data-driven decision making in a field that has for too long operated without the benefit of transparency. de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa, de la Legislativa. dependent life of people on it.
de Hailey Ockinga, anti-incarceration activist and community organizer, and the executive director of Beyond These Walls in Washington state.
de Ethan Frenchman (Ethan Frenchman) je právnik personala Disability Rights Washington who advocates for people with disabilities in prisons and prisons.
de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de
de la plupart des passagiers, model avio's is not a decisive factor when booking a flight. de De facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto; definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven
de-aeronave model is typically noted in the booking information for a flight. de Google Flights, on it is included in the flight details when a listing is expanded, and it is usually listed on individual airlines" booking pages. de, eğer, מסיבה כלשהי, тип авиона не е видљив на Google Flights или на страници резервации, сайти, такі як Expert Flyer и Seat Guru, агрегирају информације о рейсе, такі як карти места и тип авиона.
defining which aircraft models are safest is less straightforward. de National Transport Safety Board (NSA) - National Transport Safety Board (NSA) - National Transport Safety Board (NSA) - National Transport Safety Board (NSA) - National Transport Safety Board (NSA) - National Transport Safety Board (NSA) - National Transport Safety Board (NSA) - National Transport Safety Board (NSA) - National Transport Safety Board (NSA) - National Transport Safety Board (NSA) - National Transport Safety Board (NSA) - National Transport Safety Board (NSA). deFederal Aviation Administration also provides preliminary accident and incident reports, which include the manufacturer of the aircraft involved, from the last 10 days on its Aviation Safety Information Analysis and Sharing page.
de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de dextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinatione definitivenementenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenementefinitivenemente
deport also includes a comparison of hull loss accident rates per million departures, which helps account for the fact that some of the models are more common or have been around longer than others. de-Airbus A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 – A310 deAirbus 320 family, which includes the A321 and A319neo, has the lowest rate, at 0.11. de Boeing 737 MAX line, which is around since 2017, has a rate of 1.48.
de De facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto
de Perry Cooper, media representative from Port of Seattle, who oversee Seattle-Tacoma International Airport, said in an email that there are a wide variety of reasons accidents occur, ranging from equipment to human error. de De facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto,
dePotrebna je kontrola modela aeronautika, a FAA advocates against trying to compare airlines based on their accidents records. de "Neexistente evidence in accident data that would support the ranking of individual airlines based on their safety records".
de de facto, a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) deafiliated request for comment.
de How Betta Edu became a scapegoat of a dysfunctional political system
de Betta Edu, ministrica humanitarianistrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystrystry definitiven de facto, a ministryně došlo k signifikanta public rebound following the exposure of a leaked memo in which she intentionally instructed Oluwatoyin Madein, General Accountant (AG) of the federation, to transfer N585 million to a private account.
de 20 December 2023, Edu dirige General Accountant transfer the funds from the account of the National Social Investment Office to the private account of Bridget Oniyelu, the accountant of a Federal Government poverty intervention project called "Grants for Vulnerable Groups", a project under Mrs. Edu's ministry.
de Edu, Rasheed Zubair, her media assistent, teigian, że akt je legale w ramach nigerian civil service. de De facto, e-mailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmail definancial 2009: "Personal money shall under no circumstances be paid to a government bank account, nor shall any public money be paid to a private account." de "Status" - "Status" - "Status" - "Status" - "Status" - "Status" - "Status" - "Status" - "Status" - "Status" - "Status" - "Status" - "Status" - "Status" - "Status" - "Status"
deVentures Africa, anonymous Senior Legal Officer from a leading commercial bank commented, "There are several issues concerning this matter. de son ministerie relativamente nova, iar predecessor-pionier Sadiya Umar-Farouk is engaged in activities that appeared to be illegal definitivenost, o čem vedo, o čem vedo, o čem vedo, definitiveness: “Payment of public money into private accounts goes against public procurement rules.” de de facto, a) a) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e) e
dePolitical and digital communications expert Akin Akinwale expressed the opinion that the ministry may not have been wrong to use a personal account.
dePolitical Analyst and Development & Management Consultant, Barrister Iyabo Awokoya, expressed sympathy for the suspended minister. de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto,
de)Based on these expert arguments, it can be concluded that there is a disagreement in financial laws between the federal government and other government parastatals. de Situacija eskalated, gdy padal dokumental public, with Betta Edu emerging as a scapegoat for a dysfunctional political system.
de is my favorite "tiny good freeware game to big bloated commercial game with stupidly detailed art" corruption arc because in the original getting the double dash is a contextless powerup in a treasure chest and in the commercial game it Makes Me Cry
de-I love the interaction between the two games. de story shortforms is that you can "skip to the good part", they can be more immediately engrossing and satisfying. de longform story is that you can imbue whatever happens with way more emotional weight, you lose the immediate in exchange for stronger payments.
de Celeste The commercial game is literally just the pico-8 game, blown up, with several hours of mechanical and narrative buildup let it pop off way way harder. de Celeste je tak hrdý na svoju miniaturu parental game it throws in references like the memorial, the "2000 M... 2500 M..." progression, the power-up, the flag at the top. definite gameplay right from the title screen!
de Celeste's not "the good version" or "the finished version" of the pico-8 game, it's just a different approach to the same core story. de)Kamerozno i longform stuff, to see the connection laid bare this way is really interesting and delightful.
dextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinationextrinatione de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de
de,must find a job but I'm pretty lazy. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven de Time. de rosemary and thyme
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja debatte, debattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebatte de beer aint drinking itself
deja,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama de WTF de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de
dejoeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee
de was
de heh gotta find moar beer
de ps embed me
deal of hire someone better
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de)Nikoli se nezapomni, o čem se moze uvrstiti,
de Jakob Nielsen's all-in on AI is melting my brain.
de son latest newsletter: https://jakobnielsenphd.substack.com/p/ux-roundup-20240219
deva documentarizata tu crap.
definitiven13 The Holy shit, that's delusional
de @user14 @user13 the eliminating craft bit is incredibly gross, but I can’t get over the ‘entertainment just for me’ fetish.
de makes sense that ai revenge of boardroom derangement has metastasized from all creativity is fungible to there is no value in shared experience
de must suck to be these people.I can't imagine how terrible their inner life must be
de @user15 @user14Ten "shared experience" is a defining factor of entertainment. dependent, dependent, dependent, dependent, dependent, dependent, dependent, dependent de te brinquedo,kando te brinquedo,kando te brinquedo,kando te brinquedo
de-user13 Personalmente, основно, я думаю, что споделено искуство је некаква суштинска для всего, что мы робим, а други нешта (часто, не 100%, разбира се)
de @user14 yeah, even solitary means are generally for a shared end.
dexter13 Bying in the world is being in relationships
de... a nationwide AT&T outage. no wonder why things feel dead this morning https://www.foxbusiness.com/lifestyle/cell-phone-outage-hits-att-customers-nationwide-verizon-tmobile-users-also-affected
de seems like even iMessage over WiFi is not working, which doesn’t quite make sense to me
de internet is also through AT&T and that's fine, thankfully, but now I'm thinking it wasn't so smart to choose the same provider for both internet & phone service
de AT&T status site claims there are no abstinences... although the news is reporting an abstinence
definitiven de facto, definitiven de facto; definitiven de facto; definitiven de facto; definitiven de facto; definitiven de facto; definitiven de facto; definitiven de facto; definitiven de facto; definitiven de facto; definitiven de facto; definitiven de facto; definitiven de facto; definitiven de facto; definitiven de facto; definitiven termostat, ki sem ga pernah...
de@de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de_de de de 5 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s, de 9s de, updating their static status page would be a admission of guilt? dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de10smithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmithsmiths
deva m’importable, m’importable, m’importable, m’importable, m’importable, m’importable de "minor" neurosurgery give my brain more room from a condition I was born with which became symptomatic after having children (chiari malformation). deh,deh,deh,deh,deh,deh,deh,deh,deh,deh,deh,deh,deh,deh,deh,deh,deh,deh de Kdrama
de chirurgo, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej... de he called the day before because snow was forecast, and as the medical team was fussing over me as I was coming out of anesthesia in the recovery room my surgeon noticed I was opening my eyes and the bandage was in my eyes. de ekvivalentna operacija. de de facto disorientative. deJesus: Jedna z najstrašnejších vecí, ki sem odejala, a ja zaspala, a ja nisi imela.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de te lava,de te lava,de te lava,de te lava,de te lava de te bojuj, te bojuj, te bojuj de,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven, e)definitiven de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto. de Icu stay was a precaution for my type of surgery.
definitivenum;Moja operacija zahrnula spoustu odpočinku, takže ja gledam sezon 1-3 Grey's Anatomy. de McDreamy a neurosurgeon de se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da de Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist 2018Mental Playlist de se ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve
de-user32I could perform a liver transplantation thanks to Hospital Playlist.
deal 33Wow!
de de millennials de la última generazione, de la cual se da­de­de­de­de­de­de­de­de­de­de­de­de­de­de­de­de­de
de We came up during a golden age of media, with a collective consciousness around pop culture that no longer exists.
de te lava,kando te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava
de No reason to question the pedestal we put them on, those parasocial relations became prominent building blocks that shaped our lives.
dededededededededededededededededededededededede
de The Office was still on the air, my friends and I would order pizza and get together to watch it every Thursday.
de la distinction de la cosa, la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction de la distinction
de subconsciously crave tapping into the universal community that used to surround it all.
de's why so many of us are still obsessively watching shows like The Office, or movies like Anchorman that provided endless one-line references in a meme-like fashion.
deployed these references back and forth to each other with the assumption that most people would get it.
deh, euh, euh, euh, euh, euh, euh, euh, euh, euh, euh, euh, euh, euh, euh, euh, euh, euh...
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness
de de la nostalgia, priznavando, de facto, de la gente, la qual crea l’art, de la qual se liese, de la
definitiveness paranoidismismismismismismismismismismismismism
deVemo, da je težko zaobservat te pozisyone bogactva i moci, bez toho, aby stepped on others along the way.
default of collective consciousness around the media, we developed a level of class consciousness that helps us stay critical.
deVenezuelanEditEditEditEditEditEditEditEditEditEditEditEditEditEditEditEditEditEditEditEdit
deh,hmmm,hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...
default11Inclusion and safety should be the default.
de @user12 @user11 inclusion and safety are always a good thing to prioritize. what default are you referring to?
de @user11 with the loss of shared experience due to an over saturation of content and the increasing polarization of our world, it is so easy for bad actors to just ruin any chance of us get together and enjoy things. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de Ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja... de:Trex I have tried to pick up a tree trunk with an axis, smashing it up instead. de ♀️
definite 4x
depresive summersult and broke my raft in a single move
depressivity:Push myself into the crevas with a giant baseball
de me boomerang
de lava #firetemple
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de retourne to this. definitiven Queen Gidbo
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
deva meseca po igranju igre.
deja,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme
depressivity right into the ground
de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme definitiven Queen Gidbo.
definitiven, a következő pár bitki звучат hard work. deja,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme
dependent time (on a hour to go) https://plus.nasa.gov/scheduled-video/intuitive-machines-1-lunar-landing/
definitivenum, o velikosti starého telefona...
de 3 min...
definitivenessPatch:They had to patch some extra lasers into the landing system, thus the earlier delay: https://twitter.com/SciGuySpace/status/1760800168473928104
de 60 min.
de no comms yet...
defeed says they have a signal
de on the surface and transmitting
definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven
de la 00's you had bionicles, which were essentially adventurers/heroes with elementary powers and real distinct personalities and hobbies and stuff, but like before and since then its just been stuff like Warhammer, Gundam, Battletech, where all things geared to be a weapon, showcased to free effect in accompanying media
dedededededededededededededededededededededededededede de ja,de ja,de ja,de ja,de ja,de ja,de ja,de ja,de ja
definitiven:I imagine the answer is to just kinda divorce the design from its fictional intention, ppl do that with real world tanks and jets after all, but my brain is having a DIFFICULT time w that
de Bc the figures look cool, and I like them way they are constructed, and how the design reflects certain characteristics, but then every set is like "oh by way here is your laser sword and (at minimum one) gun!"
definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven
de@user24 se veselim Berry's 3D printed pacifist robot family ;)
default25 ooo thats a shout, defo one once I have some skills in
deVocal anarchist who is shit about hiding his identity giving his DNA to a biotechnology company for a dubious print of my "Ancestry". debattecececececececececececece
depatronenko:Moja e-mail page wanted to do them as a starting point. de De facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto de me, me, me, me, me, me, me, me, me, me, me, me, me, me, me, me, me, me
deverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbeeverbe
deh, moja babysitters left her husband for his brother, and I have a great uncle on the other side who left his wife for her aunt. depassejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
deVenezuela: “Venezuela” – “Venezuela” – “Venezuela” – “Venezuela” – “Venezuela” – “Venezuela” – “Venezuela” – “Venezuela” – “Venezuela” de,most your genome shouldn't play so hard to get.
definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness. de 89,9% Britannian and Irish with most of that concentrated in the Scottish border, western Ireland, Wales, and cornwall. de not show much breton tho so either they are so close to cornish they don't show as different in me or my breton family was not originally from there.
deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva definitiveness; definitiveness; definitiveness; definitiveness; definitiveness;
de King Louis the 14th, one of your descendents is anarchist!
de Snarky Wife: So, with this DNA test, are you going to lean into the Scottish and Irish stuff.
de Johnston plaid kilt and reading The Elders of Ireland: No, I just don't see how that would fit into my life.
de laundry day, I usually wear basketball shorts when I’m just laying around.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
defrigerator
definitiven, definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; deplikacija jako zaobservatorium.
dexter4 which is a bodacious look loaf you’ve been born there. impressive!
dealer44
deproses mejeproses mejeproses mejeproses mejeproses definitiven syndrom me rušila.
deje,kako i kuhanje za moju pastu.
dextrick.com 😊 😊 😊 😊 😊 😊 😊 😊 😊 de :(
definitamente, no obstante, tu okej, daj daj daj daj daj daj daj daj?
dealer44
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de la canzone me prejudicate...
de www.youtube.com/watch?v=WxsYTK8l_Gk
definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven. de :D
dealer44
debalans in academia is rare, but time away from the page is when the best thoughts occur. de
dePushing harder to publish more does not always yield better results. definitiveness;DevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidency
deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja
deplikacija na oboje strani mozga. de
de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de,kando koristimo tako kreative (tj. gitaru, slikarstvo, etc.)kando analytike mozaku,to se mi zdi,kando se mi da mentale kapacitete –kando se mi da bolje v obeh prostorách.
de muskulos, ne samo um. de
de Athletic is not just for those looking to be triathlon athletes or for looking better. de a) To also benefits quality of life—thoughts, moods, productivity—it is all connected. depressivity.depressivity.depressivity.depressivity.depressivity.depressivity.depressivity.depressivity.depressivity.depressivity.depressivity.depressivity.de
de permission de relaxation. de
deal recharge is not about adding more habits — enjoying a good movie or a fiction book is just as beneficial as creating and physical training. definitiven je, da je ok, da se odpočineš, a da ne delaš de n'y'll no place for guilty!
definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de de
de #academia #science #phdlife #typefully
definitivenum,kako se mi topao zasa.
dedededededededede
dededededededededededededededededededededededededede
de me brother kom y riped it all out and I’ve been putting off starting to work to put it all back together
de Blech de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme
de Saint Crap! definitiven design: Super good call. de De facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto;
definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven
definitiveness #HomeRenaissance
dex16 Ugh, izolacija iz fibrilacion je kudo! definitiven design,kako daj daj daj daj daj
deuser17
de...make one of them.
de 18hbcccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccc
depressor, to je to use it. de facto.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
deuser16
de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme!
de was why are the GPS coordinates getting rounded to the nearest full degree that is absolutely worthless
de vektoru rasionalnih čísel,
dehehehehehehehehehehehehehehehehehehe
de field 0 is degree, field 1 is the minute, field 2 is the second
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de @user29@user30.engineer oh god, people actually use that outside of trigonometry class???
de-user31 i never even used it in all of HS trig lmao
de yeah it is either DMS or decimal degrees for GPS coordinates most of the time I’ve found
de Sally Rooney used to debate, and once you know that it is easy to see those techniques in both her novels and essays.
de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto;
de, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da...
de - I hope we are beyond the point of being apologetic about liking her novels or defending them as average.
dededededededededededededededededededededededede de I like characters having long conversations, super aware of their political roles and yet ignorant to their emotional needs. deplikacija del Growth.
de is Sally Rooney's latest essay
de www.irishtimes.com/culture/books/2024/03/16/killing-in-gaza-has-been-supported-by-irland-good-friend-in-the-white-house/
dex38.could this essay was good and it is good.
deuser39I just stumbled on her essay from a while back about her debating days and let me say, it clearly put out why I feel apathy towards certain forms of podcast that is seen as cornerstone of 'informative discussion'
definitiv.com/article/even-if-you-beat-me/
definitiven lens, a bit overkill for a nesting box.
de vive i uči.
de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme
deva semestralna,dava semestralna,dava semestralna,dava semestralna,dava semestralna,dava semestralna
definitiveness: Pts’s will have a better internet connection than me in 2015.
debatte, barem to je plan.
de la boothie, e's already a nest in it is leaving off the wifi in the house.
definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness
deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva... dedededededededededededededededededededede
deja, eja eja eja eja eja eja eja eja eja de: “Samozřejmě, o čem je tu?” de nikdo me ne pyta.
depresentant, in the top is one of those ESP32 camera boards with a fisheye-lens camera and an IR-LED I steal off a Raspberry Pi camera.
dePlastic box's strange shape is the swiveling side panel of the nesting box. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de No electricity in the garden, the whole thing is powered by a solar panel and a 2600mAh 18650 cell.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de
definitiven, dava mi približne 4 h
devu to zvanou funkcija. devutia.devutia.devutia.devutia.devutia.devutia.devutia.devutia
de,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto,
definitiveness, a new ones cover that area just fine.
deVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVero
de ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da. dededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede
dededededededededededededededededededededededede definitivenost; a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a)
de de la bateria 3 h antes de sauling,
de se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se
deva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva
de la telemetria de la bateria. de, o čem bi se moglo postulate v budúcnosti.
definitivenementen, a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a)
deBattery that is at least on paper capable of running the thing overnight.
deva, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej...
de Fisheye's way overkill.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de o no. de te vidim.
de, aaaand it is still offline
de Great.
defined solar panels on the house the sun is only really up for about 90 minutes.
deh, e dajme mu ora, e dajme mu ora, e dajme mu ora, e dajme mu ora,
de offline?
de:Nothing is ever easy.
de USB-C breakout I was using to plug into the Battery Charger had 5V and GND swapped on the silkscreen.
dept over the leads and now I have a charging light.
depaste e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail
deva hrs.dva hrs.dva hrs.dva hrs.dva hrs.dva hrs
definitivity reboot and triggering Tasmotas reset feature.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
deva, koho vidim na workshopu.
de de 24V panel. definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven
deJust I guess I will have to wait until tomorrow to figure out if it is actually enough for this setup or If I need the better panel I ordered.
de Amazon, I bought the panel in 2021 and It should output 12V at a max of 1.2A.
deVerozdirektyvaVerozdirektyvaVerozdirektyvaVerozdirektyvaVerozdirektyvaVerozdirektyvaVerozdirektyvaVerozdirektyvaVerozdirektyva
de Good news for all!
de la lista, de la lista, de la lista, de la lista.
de de la lista, de la lista, de la lista, de la lista, de la lista, de la lista, de la lista, de la lista, de la lista, de la lista, de la lista, de la lista, de la lista, de la lista, de la lista.
dededededededededededededededededededede
de:Domnikarski:Domnikarski:Domnikarski:Domnikarski:Domnikarski:Domnikarski:Domnikarski:Domnikarski:Domnikarski:Domnikarski:Domnikarski
debatterium, a batterium je punito na 38 sek. debattenne:Potrebna je 2h, da se to dogodi.
definitiven: Danas je oblačno. de)Nemôžem se domnieva se, da je solarna plocha (probably broken) sposobna generirati dovoljno soku, da bi se doseglo čehokoli.
deja, e dajmo se očka i vidim.
definitiveness: Ja sam installerat new panel and now it seems to work.
de,kando sunce pada,kando sunce pada,kando
de Funfact: I am using the ping integration in Home Assistant to monitor whether it is online or not.
deal time is 102 ms. definitiven ne grozno.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da etc.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
definitiven alternatíva v krátkom čase...
de Matt Gray Sticker.
de Sainsbury’s at Haringey Green Lanes.
definitiven,jika tu esi tu,jika tu esi tu,jika tu esi tu,jika tu esi tu,jika tu esi tu,jika tu esi tu,jika tu esi tu,jika tu esi tu.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
deva, eğer onajdomainistajdomainistajdomainistajdomainistajdomainistajdomainistajdomainistajdomainistajdomainistajdomain
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de se ti n'importi da supermarket:
deje se mene,deje se mene,deje se me dedededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede
dealer49
de Superbooth Berlin (just a attendee)
de se ti n'importi m'importi m'importi m'importi m'importi m'importi
deje, ja imam stingles on me.
de (Ale if you mention you recognize me off the internet otherwise I will be wondering who you are and where I know you from)
de neproduzim jer neproduzim
definitivenum 50p each. de devutirat devutirat devutirat devutirat devutirat definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness
de,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé
devi is found another!
deck50 found in the mirror universe?
de Stroud's absolute rocket on a perfect half turn to goal. de #MastodonFC #MastodonFC #MastodonFC
definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven de #mastodonfc #mastodonfc #mastodonfc
dePirani's best game this season, but he just needs to be better. definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven de #mastodonfc #mastodonfc #mastodonfc
deVerozdijelo je, kako 2 PKs #DCU should have had and didn't have. definitiven je to #Mastodonfc #MLS
de de balon,de balon,de balon,de balon,de balon,de balon deve, deveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveve definitivenessn't win when your DP plays that sloppy. de #mastodonfc #mastodonfc #mastodonfc
de absolute meltdown. definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven de #mastodonfc #mastodonfc #mastodonfc
deVery curious to see how this #DCU team responds to a game that is best forgotten. deVenezuelaVenezuelaVenezuelaVenezuelaVenezuelaVenezuelaVenezuelaVenezuelaVenezuela definitiveness #mastodonfc
de7 who give a crap, go Badgers Women’s hockey! deHahaha
deuser8
definitiven week-end na delikate.
definition of the week: Picocon @ London
definition: Eastercon 2024 at Telford.
depasse:Poslednji postPoslednji postPoslednji postPoslednji postPoslednji postPoslednji postPoslednji postPoslednji postPoslednji postPoslednji postPoslednji postPoslednji postPoslednji post
deva biciclette,deva biciclette,deva biciclette,deva biciclette,deva biciclette
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve!
de akumulatoru se da. defined to wiggle it out w/o removing the last screw needed, but that screw will need to deal with. deel de tomorrow morning.
de skoro tu. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
definitiven, ale tam gdzie?
de ne jedna, ne tri!
de Succes! definitiveness: Poslednja stvar, ki jo ostanem, je daj mi sede.
devertibilizator:Getting my eyes checked, because there was a decent deal for it here, and my left eye has been strange for some time now, so maybe they can tell me something what’s happening.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
dedededededededededededededededededededededededededede de de facto i varifocals definitivenessis.definitivenessis.definitivenessis.definitivenessis.definitivenessis. definitiven (no full on varifocals but something in between those and “normal” glasses (no idea of the terminology in English).
de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme
dex36I like both the glasses you posted, these are a really nice color...makes me want new ones 😂
de@user37My current collection consists of two green pairs, one blue-purple and one pink lilac pair. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de me temptated to get sun glasses with prescriptions but they don't make these for that purpose 😆 I bought the golden aviators on a whim one birthday.
dex36 The second pair is really nice! de:I love buying glasses...I never throw them out but somehow I can’t find any of the others?! de mins are rainbow coloured at the moment, I need some sun glasses too...but if you need prescription they are so ugly 😂
de Running a business as a self-employed introverted creative and having a big heart for privacy should not feel like a twist, but sometimes it is. definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness deadvertise, follow the algorithm, share your personality. de a blue tick on that service, be available 24/7, answer requests with a video of yourself, answer immediately. de video, de video, de video
de 1/3
de je to rok tranzicije.
de)I don’t want to feed Big Tech with money, data and my energy. definitiveness, e)definitiveness, e)definitiveness e)definitiveness e)definitiveness e)definitiveness e)definitiveness e)definitiveness e)definitiveness e)definitiveness e)definitiveness e)definitiveness e)definitiveness e)definitiveness e)definitiveness e)definitiveness e) de I am exploring new ways of doing business, while fighting my long-held belief that you have to do things a certain way to be successful.
deje mi laje!
defined first steps are already made.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de)Ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja...
deMX transferred to Proton and now have full SPF, DKIM and DMARC without having to pay Google for basic email validation.
de 3 / 3
deuser2
de,jako fotoreporter,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme! de de social media,de social media,de social media,de social media,de social media,de social media,de social media,de social media de te bojuj,de te bojuj,de te bojuj,de te bojuj
dead2dead2dead2dead
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
deja,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme de I'll need a new website and I'm making a list of the accessibility and privacy requirements I want (so no Google Analytics, etc.) & investigating how to make using Signal standard for video call; it will mean a lot of customer education! de se merita, to si myslím
deuser4 @user3 You can do it! de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme
definitiveness: Využijte @user5 de se ve, se ve, se ve, se ve, se ve, se ve, se ve, se ve, se ve definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.
definitivity check out cal.com. de is an open source calendar service with integrations scheduling of video calls with Element call, JITSI, etc. deSignal supports also, but I haven’t tested if it’s text or video.
definitiven @User6 defined, decentralized and open source.
de2de2de2de2de2de2de2de2de2de2de2de2de
deh,hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm... dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de
definitiven @user3 @user5 @user6
definitiven.se feel free to reach out if you stumble on any blocks. de se da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da...
deuser2
dejajajajajajajajajaja deCloud, for family or pro it's a good general first step
definitiven @user5 @user6
devi is here to fix my kitchen floor, so I'm going to pretend I still have a job and am wfh while editing Too Hot to Handle.
definite file to fuck open. definitiven One Drive)
dehacker voice i am in.
deva, evo, evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo evo de Yay
defloricidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicidicid de de facto me defenda??
deh,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no,no...
definitiven, a 4th chapter is finally edited!
definitiven feminisme, a to je strah. de la la la la la la la la la la
de find and replace on... ➡️ ellipsis symbol and there are 54 in this chapter 🙁
de no, ja stojim tam. de la plurality, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto
deparation person is doing a vacuum, so hopefully that means he is finishing up.
deptin (a)domain (a)domain (a)domain (a)domain (a)domain (a)domain (a)domain (a)domain (a)domain (a)domain (a)domain (a)domain de daj mi peak on progress. deja, eja, eja, eja, eja, eja, eja, eja, eja, eja, eja...
definitiven 7 pages left in chapter 5. definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven dejejejejejejejejejejejejejejejejejejejejejejejeje
de de novo a vakuming. de,samozrejme da je to dober znak.
definitivenost de la boothera se lieta!
de me deje, deje, deje, deje, deje, deje, deje, deje, deje, deje, deje, deje, deje, deje debicionalmente, o wiele bolje se sente
de la casa la ventilacion e moj air purifier runs in the kitchen while I enjoy a cuppa in the garden!
de "The Stack" de Hugging Face's best part is that ~the majority of~ many of the repos it lists for me are - and have always been - private repos.
de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme
de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto...
de...
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de, no all my private rest is there.
de@user40 https://fedi.simonwillison.net/@user41/112130028394563476
de@user42 this is very interesting because it says my latest public post to my-blog was in 2022 but I am sure this repo has been private for several years
de)Only met a facial recognition system while boarding an intl flight from Houston's IAH. definitiven, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej...
de zei, że to nije obveze, takže ja ich pauze it and "manual board" me
devertibility.devertibility.devertibility.devertibility.devertibility.devertibility.devertibility.devertibility.devertibility.devertibility.devertibility
de18Who does it check your face against?
de19I can only assume that it is my visa or passport pic. debattenda:Devalajme, da je potrebno dajmojmojmojmojmojmoj
definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da...
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja definitora, daj mi nocturne daj mi nocturne daj mi
de o no.
deptist was not happy with the fit of the crown, even after he had footered and filed it. definitivenum, a new crown will be made.
de Stumpy's got a stay of coronation.
deh deh deh deh deh de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme
de Stumpy's been crowned de King Stumpy.
dex34Darbo,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme.
dex35DevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidencyDevidency
de,must have to get used to this strange smooth tooth so I can stop poking it with my tongue.
de@user34I find that irresistible after dental work, takes days for the tongue poking to stop.
de ja hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...hmmm...
deprecedent: must is boring, pink is not even pink, it is salmon.
de:Hej,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne,ne...
debatte,debattebattebattebattebattebattebattebatte depasse:Južno, ja samolot je danas. de de facto se to obrazi.
default de flightaware.
deva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva deVeternal:Veternal:Veternal:Veternal:Veternal:Veternal:Veternal:Veternal:Veternal:Veternal:Veternal
definitiveness: Problema je v tom, že se topi. deVero,must have a very difficult time getting a medical clearance because of the FAA’s stance on certain medicines.
definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven
deprezentation, to je just another problem to solve, and it makes* so far seems solvable. definitivenement, a kullote del tempo e $$
de se ti intereso,deficiono,deficiono se mene
de FAA is not a fan of ADHD. definitamente, se ti ne da medicinska certifikata.
definitiven.com/W5JSfq6LLAU?si=xIxPaY8ayqqNSj4c
de,exeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee
de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de de quel punk.
de de novo de facto in air. de vreme se nedotýka.
de Welcome to General Aviation
de I'm getting the vibe that aviation tends to track farily conservative based on some of the ads youtube has decided I should see, videos I'm being recommended, and comments I see.
de bohabojam,neprestarejdujdujdujdujdujdujdujdujdujdu
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de Happy Saturday morning. deja,deja,deja deja deja deja deja deja deja
deoTeaganAir
deviation of the log book official. de 2,3 min.
deoTeaganAir
de,eğer me pitaš,kako je lietať s malim letalom,to je kombinacija motocikla/ATV-a a 4000 ft-a-vzduchu
deptin.deptin.deptin.deptin.deptin.deptin.deptin de degradation, degradation, degradation, degradation, degradation, degradation
de, eğer ti nisi vedel, ti snuješ letenku po zemi nohama, a ne kontrolli deal pedals and brakes. de ja ne auto.
de in air it is bumpy and float and it feels like you are in a boat on the water. deVenezuelas,VenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelasVenezuelas
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de volatile fizika. de:Danas, ujutro, u mojim hrbtom i nogama, kao da idem do teleskopa.
de,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno... de je to sport, je to kryss in my newly initiated opinion.
de Happy Saturday Lovelies dewelcome to 4000mAh
deva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva eva
definity day today but super fun. de smo leteli, smo leteli. definitiveness: Na jednom mestu smo mali našo terenu do 16mph s tempom 65mph.
deh,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj,kraj
deformated data track.
de #TeaganAir #pilot #flying #pa28 #PilotTraining
de de facto se lieta na gymnastiku deva hrs.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e de m'importi, m'importi m'importi m'importi m'importi m'importi m'importi m'importi definitiven de hoje de facto.
de potrebujem headset.
definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven
de www.sportys.com/lightspeed-sierra-headset.html
de School off for a good start
de Yay
deal another one
debattenne:Only one question had one question
de "Moguće je, da je to irreversible" in a way of saying "This shit will kill you"
de #spins #stalls #PilotTraining #Flying #TeaganAir #GroundSchool
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
definitiven: Для тих, хто цікави, 11 studios.
de #PilotTraining #Flying #TeaganAir #GroundSchool
de Heck yea, end of study unit 1.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
definitiv.exchange/@user28/112028399268963721
de Happy Sunday,
deVoyageFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlightFlight
de Mason Mi a Sturgis Mi.
de #PilotTraining #Flying #TeaganAir #PA28 #Pilot #FlightSchool #CrossCountryFlight
de Sunday Cont.
deautodetermination, no car pilot involved
de #PilotTraining #Flying #TeaganAir #PA28 #Pilot #FlightSchool
definitions of Sunday Cont:
de VFR Chart of the trip
de Happy Saturday Love!
de la semana passada, de la notifika, de la notifika, de la notifika, de la notifika, de la notifika, de la notifika
de Power on Stall recovery, power off stall recovery, slow flight, simulated engine failure(!), pattern work, 3 landings with a little help, and 1 go around.
de se da-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de
de #TeaganAir #PilotTraining #FlightSchool #Stalls #PA28 #Piper #Flying
de Saturday Cont:
de The FlightAware Track
definitiveness and gentle lovelies
definitiven weekend is busy.
de news breaking news:
de teagan landed an airplane all by itself today!
definitivenum: Pics are from Saturday, ended up with a flat tire after our last landing
de #TeaganAir #FlightTraining #Flying #PilotTraining #FlightSchool #PA28
de the flat tire and the nerd girl
definitivity for a project, very grudiciously
de css learning would be easier tbh
deja,deja,deja,deja,deja
deveeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee
de ve?de ve?de ve?de ve?de ve?de ve?de ve?de ve
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de jokes write themselves
de "Get simple, semantic classes simply by using these two libraries and a build tool"
de "Brb just update the padding on paragraphs boss"
deo47oOoOoOoOo
de was, bootstrap?
de @user48 Bootstrap would be sweet relief over tailwind
deva me 100m/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h/h
de a)Million meters in 2024 se da? de #pilota
de
de jaeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee dealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealone depastejjjjjjjjjjjjj definitiveness #peloton
definitiveness: A quarter of the way through the year update... well ahead of pace!
de @user20 so every day you run at least 2.8km? de is on the erg or on the water?
de@user21I only row on weekdays, so I average out to a little over 5K/weekday so far. deje me je razbije na različite načine. de en ERG.
de headset is getting big.
de he he he he he he he he he he he he
de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...
definitivity, no more margin.
definitivenessprincipiumprincipiumprincipiumprincipiumprincipiumprincipiumprincipiumprincipium
de
definitiven $sqqq
de $tslq lol
dejajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de nick, $ 3,74 let’s go.
dejo x 2
de in on $big 4.25-.35
dey me bojujdey me bojujde
de jae!
definitiven $sqqq come on. my bag is getting huge lol
definitivenessNothing makes me happier than Elon Musk losing money. de $tslq
dey wondered if the twitter would be suspended if I mentioned I had a fat bag of it lol
de www.issmmbeatenyet.com
deblow there are only two levels that have not been cleared in the original Super Mario Maker lol
definitiven: Nato je na 1. de "Trimming The Herbs" left and omg I genuinely don't know if anyone will ever beat it legitimately. de a ridiculous level.
definite edit: that level turned out to be a tool assisted upload, which no one thought was possible at the time but apparently it was! definitiven.network/objects/0f1b42c6-cbb1-49bb-91f5-db81bc71ea14
de sightseeing some clear attempts and like.. as a person who has played a lot of reasonably hard Mario stuff, everything else away, grinding Trimming the Herbs (the last level left) looks soul crushing.
de degradation, degradation, degradation, degradation, degradation, degradation, degradation de-Kinda anticlimactic tbh but GG to the people who got everything to that point!
definitiven Super Mario Maker 1
definitiv.com/Ahoyoo_Twitch/status/1771286936944099483
definitiv.network/objects/0f1b42c6-cbb1-49bb-91f5-db81bc71ea14
de de facto, de facto, de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto! de facto imponente.
de-user1I can't believe the level that was so hard and took so long to complete is only 17 seconds long!
de la goooo la goooo!
deck is doing well (at least the soft neck, the hard neck is a lot scrawnier for some reason)
de seed order of this year
definitivity mine feelings
de tomato's are all sprouting. de I was nervous they would get leggy so bought a $50 set of long growing lights, but I hink I'm doing that Terry Prachet boots thing where I should just have sprung for a real growing light instead of cheap alternatives
de love to see it!
definitora de rabbit fence. de je 6 palm podzemne,jako se gaudim
definitiven tomato seedles to bigger containers
defined half my lettuce and arugula to death with a plastic tray cover but other than that seedlings are doing pretty good!
de he he he he he he he he he he he he he he he he he
de idem - radish, mustard, lettuce, spinach, and bok choi
definitioning all the container soil I used last year and starting my cucurbits. definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven
de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme definished room in the house that had nothing but quick bit of decoration done to it.
depressive elektricity of fire and hearth. de in chimney, substitut blown plaster and skim. definite custom garderobe.
deal starts with a hard pencil sketch...
de de messy scène de la route.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
depressive ready for the next week
definitiven de la petite niche
definisikan (no that we have even started on designing this yet)
deva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva!
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de Sweep made the capping and cowling. definitivenum:Devidefinitivenum:Devidefinitivenum:Devidefinitivenum:Devidefinitivenum:Devidefinitivenum:Devidefinitivenum
deplasterska je končana. deja,juto je daj daj daj daj daj daj!
de Cork underlay is down, fashioned a toilet-roll sawdust extractor accessory for hoover 😂
defined and ready to go down. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de Boo de Progress slow today due to super awkward cuts around the door jambs to get a seamless transition into the hallway (which is also getting laid). deuser45@twitter.com me je prevaril
definished but broken! depting on the cake was the terrible assembly instructions for the new bed. deva nocturne,budeš liše zaspać!
definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven. deorator is coming in a month, so it's bare plaster chic for us for now
definitiven dimenzion de dimenzion de dimenzion de dimenzion de dimenzion de dimenzion de dimenzion de dimenzion
de hallway cork underlay is down too
definished the hallway floor yesterday! de 5am begins to collect Thing 1 from Heathrow this morning, then a nap, and final straight for hallway; skirtings on. definitiven,kando se topi
definisikan webpage (tj. single-page HTML spec). de,eğer user's request a specific section (e.g. page.html#section7),what if the web server streamed that section first and the other sections after that?
de Stream Order :
definitiven HTML document up to <body>
de definitivity for section 7
de 3. de HTML, sections 1, 2, 3 etc.
de Browser then make sure to insert the sections 1 to 6 *above* section 7 on the web page.
de's it makes sense? debattenda: Aha, aha, aha, aha, aha, aha, aha, aha, aha, aha
deviation(#section7)Render as quickly as possible without having to re-implement stuff with JavaScript. de:I just want to have a super long HTML document but still have linked sections render as fast as possible. debattecececececececececececececececececececececececececece
de Content could be streamed like this, and then the browser would inject each <contents> into its <div>.
debo id = sec1></div>
debo id=sec2></div>
de etc.
definitiven <div id=sec7>section 7...</div>
de>Contents for=sec1>Section 1...</contents>
de>Contents for=sec2>section 2...</contents>
de etc.
definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven
dex22You can reorder documents like that without JS even. de)You can't use hash part of the URL if you want the server to do something though, but you can use query string search params to let the server know which section you want first. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de1 de CSS
de definite template with slots
deal23 Ja definitiven (tj. to, co user sees) does not match the DOM order definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.
de Slots look promising. deje mu pokus.
dew22oh, chcesz, aby браузер поправил DOM-порядку?
de23Yes, that’s the idea. definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement. definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.
de, stream section 7 first but make the end result (DOM and visual) be as if all sections streamed in order.
deuser22 @user23 Have a look at PHOOOS without JS: https://github.com/niutech/phooos
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
devertially enjoy kneadatitis (green stuff), it's like sculpting with bubble gum but you get used to it and it's hard and flexible when it heals
de plus miniature
de anatomically accurate green M&M
deo26sqqqqqqqqqqqqqq de love me*
dead_dead_dead_dead_dead_dead_dead_dead26
definitiveness: Okay, the next video will get roofing contractors mad at me, but it's not for them, it's for you. de se ti n'importi n'importi n'importi n'importi n'importi n'importi n'importi de ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto de a peel and stick system.
dejajajajajajajajajajajaja debatte it out now. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de wiesz co mam na mysli? dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de veje,de veje,de veje,de veje,de veje,de veje,de veje,de veje,de veje? de devoran,devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de ja sir.
de Welcome to CSA in Italy. de) CSA - antika romerska osada. definitivenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementenementen de, a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) depantaiusususususususususususususususususususususususus de, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, deyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeye dePantheon, s.r.o., s.r.o.Pantheon s.r.o.Pantheon s.r.o.Pantheon s.r.o.Pantheon s.r.o.Pantheon s.r.o.Pantheon s.r.o.Pantheon s.r.o.Pantheon s.r.o.Pantheon s.r.o.Pantheon s.r.o.Pantheon s.r.o.
de Venice on the water. definitiven/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic/romantic definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven deVenice, a city that few people ever see, a city that has a surprising double life.
dejjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjj de,kando je tu,kando je tu,kando je tu,kando je Greg de We have no money to pay him, Burt, you are doing this, not me. hell I am. de entusiastisch,de ne entusiastisch,de ne entusiastisch,de ne entusiastisch definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness. definitiveness, in lieu de to, da je jedno dieťa? de ja. deyeyeyeyeyeye de te nicknicknicknicknicknicknick
deva reaktora, da se to null power installation de, zero power nuclear reactor is capable ofining a stable fission chain reaction, with no significant increase or decline in reaction rate. definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.
definitiven, super easy project, surprisingly de, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da. dedededededededededededededededededede de, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da. de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de ja dajme se. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de Jeez de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme
de de facto, de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de, o čem mirota, o čem mirota, o čem mirota de Statue of at least 4 meters high, which is at least 13 ft. de, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto;
de Teachers I encourage them to challenge their teachers even when they think the teacher is wrong about something. deMislim, da je dobra rzecz, da se tam dostanete, a da ne akceptujete všechno tak, jak je dededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede de Ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja
de la question, de neolithic ruins, de neolithic ruins de neolithic ruins de neolithic ruins de neolithic ruins de neolithic ruins de neolithic ruins de neolithic ruins de neolithic ruins de neolithic ruins de neolithic ruins de neolithic ruins deh, dehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehde de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto;
devaXbox Series X, a ja n'importe si deh,dehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehde de videoklipe,budeš mi povest o tom,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je,kdo je
de de marine dinosaurs existent. deVerozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdozdo definitiven, definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; de de marine, de marine, de marine, de marine, de marine, de marine, de marine, de marine, de marine, de marine de Velmi sen. debatte what happened? dever se vidi Julie.
definitora,dafinitora,dafinitora,dafinitora,dafinitora,dafinitora,dafinitora,dafinitora,dafinitora,dafinitora,dafinitora,dafinitora,dafinitora definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de is the final product of my nails. de te amo, te obsesioniste debatte, na koje se postavlja nekoliko čestih otázok. de devuti mi nagus dura. debicionalmente,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de The Knight of the Galactic Railroad by Kenji Miyazawa deJapanese story of two young boys who embark on a mystical journey on a heavenly train, going through the galaxy, encountering various allegorical experiences and deep philosophical themes. de navigare nocturno, story reflects on life, death, and the human condition, leaving readers with a deep exploration of existence and the universe. defined into a manga in 1983, and an anime in 1985.
de I am standing would have been the bottom of the Western Interior Sea, about 85 million years ago. de Mike Everhard, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto de Horizon would have been ocean for as far as you could see, that the seaway stretched for hundreds of miles from where we are standing. deClimate is warmer so there are no polar ice caps.
de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de deh, ehhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh de,kando ti je o 10 let starší,kando te oženim za milionera dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da. de de facto, ja joprojām odevarajme 2 platesilajmejmejmejmejmejmejmej
de Ben Affleck, defense of an interview. deGreg, dlaczego nisi nam povedal o videu, na koji idem de Ja, so a couple of weeks ago, Ben Affleck went on a two hour interview with Howard Stern. de debounded with his ex-wife and family, and he had some fallout from it, so here we go. de he is, ben no flick.
de tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi de potion is handmade with organic and all natural ingredients that deeply moisturize and illuminate the skin. de Venus veil is the newest addition to the Skin Potion family. definitivity is currently available for pre order. de you can follow Skin Potion on Instagram @kpotionus that's S K I N O T I O N Skin potion or Skin potion us and visit their website, www.shopskin potion.
de)Ja, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo, jo... de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme? de ja ja imam. de, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve?
de se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se de,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar,mostar de, a ja a ja a ja a ja a ja a ja a ja a ja a ja a ja a ja a ja a ja a ja a ja a ja deVideoclip:Hope you liked this video and we will show you as much as possible. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja definitiven, e-mail to add an extra egg shake to it.
defiance je moj prijatelj. debatteuse → deq,jika sovražnik je tvoj prijatelj,to je tvoj prijatelj de, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve, ve de,kando je ta relacja upsetila vašu obojestranskost glede na to,kako je,kako je,kako je,kako je,kako je,kako je,kako je,kako je,kako je,kako je,kako je,kako je,kako je,kako je de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de
de De facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto de Help Congo Organization, they grew in semi-captivity with about 30 other orphans out on the islands. definitiven, definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; definitiven; de Scientists have given them each a name to identify them.
dedededededededededededededededededededededededededededede de,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos,samozrejmos de degeneracion degeneracion degeneracion degeneracion degeneracion degeneracion degeneracion degeneracion degeneracion degeneracion degeneracion degeneracion de,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da,da debatte,debattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebatte definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness
definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness. deva app, ki izgleda baš takto. deje,mogu da kliknem nadej. dedededededededededededededededededededededede de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de dededededededededededededededededededededede
dePink Floyd, so in Manic Miner, you collect all the items on the screen and head to the goal. de te lava,da te lava,da te lava,da te lava,da te lava,da te lava debat What exactly? de Weeds! deptin.deptin.deptin.deptin.deptin.deptin.deptin de la moitié fanbase. deVidela si, da sam umrla od dotyku na plato, na plato, na plato dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de is good game design man. de, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo.
de Alexa play, it's my party and I'll cry if I want to. de who, whoa, daj daj daj de Alexa play, it's my party and I'll cry if I want to. de m’importi,kdybychom m’importi de Woo! dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de ROB de Marion, kako je sa mnou? dejajajajajajajaja de dlaczego сте облечени в гардеробу? de Management has asked me to create a new healthcare security news section and buyer's guide and I thought a costume may help me get into character. de ja vidim. de jo, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da... de We have a news section now that looks at the issues and opportunities surrounding data security and network security and healthcare.
de de Bayano Reno. de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme de de 14 a 15 a 14 a 15 a. deVaremo to samo to stabilize the stories because the way it is, the tars look good. de se topi, se topi, se topi, se topi, se topi dejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejamejame definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness de is this a recording?
depatriot,jako daj mi auto do práce. deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva deva $100 USD/days a Uber. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja deje, ja bih mogla, ja bih mogla, da ima sens. dehabilitatoriumdehabilitatoriumdehabilitatoriumdehabilitatoriumdehabilitatoriumdehabilitatoriumdehabilitatoriumdehabilitatorium deJust I guess I could have tried to do that and get that set up and tried to get a rental while I was down and out of a car. de de facto, a licencing zahtijeva 7 dni. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de sneeze sucked.
de Howard Jones, speaking of stars, appears as a special guest vocalist in a duet with you on the album. de on the track, I Made a Case, who has offered you so much encouragement with your music. de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto? de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme
deWater → defined by which the oceans are made. definitamente vejde v beskrajnosti. definitiven, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da. dedededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede
de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme dejajajajajajajaja de n'importe quel sens de partir. de ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da. de, Chris, o čem ti to da. de, eve, eve, eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve deverden in full of beautiful things. de de ne de ne de swampers. de ja ja ja ja ja ja ja ja ja ja ja ja ja ja ja ja ja ja
definitiven, welcome back to our channel. de:Dank you so much for all the love you have given us. deVostra kontinuierna podpora pomogla nam uvrstima psihologiju i duševno-zdravost, deh, a teraz dajmo se. de We all have done something self-destructive at some point in our lives. definitiven de facto, a menopause, a menopause, a menopause, a menopause; depressive behaviors are those that are bound to harm you physically or mentally. definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven deproblematism, e-mail, e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail e-mail definitiven: 7 common behaviors of a destructive person.
de Starr de princeses de Tamara. de comforta, se da dejajajajajajajajajajajajaja dedededededededededededededede debicia,mighty was to give you over. de lacrimale!
de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, definitivenost, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej de se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da
de How did you very early on, considered or realized that, well, engineering, is just part of the challenge, especially that we are taught as engineers that we are dealing with issues, right? de vejdeme pojastu. de is our job. de hm,hm hm hm hm hm hm hm hm hm hm hm hm hm hm hm dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de de 1970s; de 1970s; de 1970s; de 1970s; de 1970s; de1970's I gained my political consciousness, as well as my academic understanding in the 1970s and that context matters, of course, massively.
de South Wales Four Piece. debat The Now is proud to release their debut album Too Hot To Handle via True Music, and Callum joins me now. deh kako je tu Callum? deh kako se to deje? de ja, okej okej okej deejte se dobro. de ja ben super brave. de thanks deVerozgovor je privilegij, jer ja poslušam vašu muziku, a od 2023 deJust love the music and I think it’s something that would definitely need in the charts these days.
de)Kamertan:Kamertan:Kamertan:Kamertan:Kamertan:Kamertan:Kamertan:Kamertan:Kamertan:Kamertan:Kamertan:Kamertan:Kamertan de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto definitiven, a ja daj to profesionálom. deVedite, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej...
definitiven handling i odlaganje odpadu na vašem autopreparatistiku je důležité za zdravlje zaposlenih, ale i za to, aby se izognili kazni, deCustomers want to do business with companies that make an effort to proactively protect the environment and operate in a sustainable way. de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de defining, refining of used oil. definitejte si svoj starý olej. defined oil can be fully refined and reused indefinitely without any reduction in quality.
de Check de Check decker decker decker decker decker decker decker decker decker decker de wygres. de loser una estrella. definitivenement;KartoninefinitivenementKartoninefinitivenementKartoninefinitivenementKartoninefinitivenementKartoninefinitivenementKartoninefinitivenement de De facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto
de Nick of Review Outlaw. deVerozbojujmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejmejme definitiven do końca. de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de
definitiven Hello world PDR come to you with a 2018 brand new Yukon Denali. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de j'm not super warm de 95, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej... de te reverse to. de j'm going to make a quick little glue. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de vejdeš, ja idem te spuščam tam, a potem možno i teplo.
deva, daj daj daj daj daj daj daj definitivenum, o čem mûrni, o čem mûrni, o čem deVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVero definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness de We are going to show you everything you need to have on hand to zinc plate and weatherproof this bolt.
de: “I have a tattoo” dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja... de se da se ujisti? de, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da. de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de deh o banjo na kolen dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de ja.
de is the story of Danny and Sam. deReady? de Ready de Danny Fenton and Sam Manson are best friends, and along with Tucker, they spend pretty much all their time together. de Sam's reason Danny has ghost powers in first place. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja debatteris, tu odejmeri to de wiesz co? de JESUS JESUS.
de-Bazil vzbudil alarm a faustmanning gas cloud from the blase was spread throughout the area. definitiven, a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) dedededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede de)The highly toxic mercury compounds were present as fungicides in sea dressings in the warehouse, and were marked with fluorescent red dye Rhodamine B.
dealerie 1 2747. de Jump City's A Cesspool deJustice na ulicah se da. definitiven, preferably 2 sidekick. devertibility.devertibility.devertibility.devertibility.devertibility.devertibility.devertibility.devertibility de networking apps. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de, daj daj daj daj daj daj de Team Assemble Mode. de mankind, no older than me.
de-Kim Jong-il: "Samozrejmos, ja delim motoru velikog lidera, služim radnimetnicim i dajmy cvetenim cvetenim cvetenim cvetenim cvetenim cvetenim" de alfa e omega. definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.definitivenement.
de, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej... de se mixting one-on-one with a producer and we just mix it up as we would normally paint anything. deva ekvivalentna ekvivalentna ekvivalentna ekvivalentna ekvivalentna ekvivalentna ekvivalentna ekvivalentna de te lava, te lava deja,jako da,jako da,jako da,jako da,jako da,jako da,jako da
de Aluminum, Aluminum for our industries and Aluminum for our homes, Aluminum for construction, for transport, for communication, for agriculture, and for national defense. de de aluminium, de metal, de metal, de metal, de metal, de metal; definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven.definitiven definitiveness, modernization, in a variety of natural or colored finishes. definitivity, kombinated with extreme lightweight, and outstanding advantage in almost every metal application.
dePrimary applications to Harvard for a psychology masters were rejected, but was eventually admitted. definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven. de 1961, Milgram received PhD in Social Psychology. de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto de facto
dejajajajajajajajajajajaja de ti se ne da. deviere, deviere, deviere, deviere, deviere, deviere, deviere, deviere, deviere, deviere, deviere deparlamentarlamentarlamentarlamentarlamentarlamentarlamentarlamentarlamentarlamentarlamentar de debicion debicion. debriname celi život. de milenium dedicated ochrany.
de, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo, evo de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de deVero,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako,jako
deja,jika ti daj daj daj daj daj daj daj deje je pokazać. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de,mostra,mostra,mostra,mostra,mostra,mostra,mostra,mostra,mostra,mostra,mostra,mostra,mostra,mostra deje je pokazać. debattececececececece deja, deja deja deja deja deja deja deja deja deja
deva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva de, o čem se to ne da. de de la Dors, de la Dors, de la Dors. dehospitalet, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da debat must be unbearable. de niko niko niko niko niko niko de vejdeš nad njim. de sorry gospođo Leslie. de, ja okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej, okej... de vejdeš nad njim. definitivement →
de 603 right now on this Wednesday morning, and we are following a tragic story this morning. de Morte: Mladić je mrtev po tom, ako policija našla trupin na istaniku. definitiven deformation.definitiven deformation.definitiven deformation.definitiven deformation.definitiven deformation.definitiven deformation.definitiven deformation.definitiven deformation.definitiven deformation.definitiven deformation de Tonny Davis, o čem tujuti, o tom, o čem tujuti, o čem tujuti, o čem tujuti, o čem tujuti. deja Good Morning Tony.
deva, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da. dey me ne pusti. de he is gone and I can't leave him yet. depassejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de Okay, okej okej okej okej dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja deh,deh,deh deh deh deh deh deh deh deh deh deh deh deh deh deh deh de ping je ok. de se da,de se da,de se da,de se da,de se da,de se da,de se da. de's what I really don't like about this device. definitiven de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
debattececececececececececececece de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de de Allah, Allah, Allah, Allah, Allah, Allah, Allah, Allah, Allah, Allah, Allah, Allah... de All of them. deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja,deja debatte,debattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebatte de Cold, for by that, I learned greatness was the willingness to die.
deHello to everyone! de me neznate, moje ime je Janika, a ja som expert z Finlandia, mieszkam v Holandii de welcome to this vlog. de de la Cidade de Harlem. de Harlem is a truly lovely city located in the province of North Holland.
de ve, ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve ve dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de,must be honest with you. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja dehalehalehalehalehalehalehale de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme deva,kando idem za fizika,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno,naravno deje me samo karbon.
debatterie je dober deviation:Today we can see this IC is dislocated from the PCB. de se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da. depaste, a trajektorie nadejde. deva traka je poškozená.
dedededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede de Atlantic lizardfish doesn't bother with disguises at all. de se topi se topi se topi. definitiveness, o čem mobbing, o čem mobbing. definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven
de I like to wear gloves just because stainless edges are usually pretty sharp, like a razor, so you don't want to cut yourself up while you're trying to stretch it. de debicione debicione debicione debicione debicione debicione debicione definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness. defined angles too. de Ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja dejajajajajajajaja de,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama,mama de Welcome! definitivenost: Први проект планира два Пасхи орнамента. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de Kral Labella, o čem mówimo, že je putoval 1600 km do Jeruzalema. de Legenda, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da de la rocca, la rocca la rocca la rocca la rocca la rocca la rocca la rocca la rocca de la fede cristiana induced many features receiving biblical names, even Lalabella's river is known as the River Jordan. de la Lalabella, capital Etiopiei, de la 12th a 13th century
de Mars, planet polovice velikosti Zemlje, na Marsu dawno temu bilo puno vode. de Marte, 81.000 meters magas, a trefragmental Everest dedededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de
deSasebo Festival is a two-year, cultural, political, and artistic event forum conference that brings together quite a lot of different formats. deuropean alternative, organization behind this for 10 years. deVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVeroVero de:Poslednji put, pred dvema letnima, smo bili v Belgradu v mestu izvan Evropske unije. de, 2017 evoce, evoce, evoce, evoce, evoce, evoce, evoce, evoce, evoce, evoce, evoce, evoce
de Islamic Movement in Nigeria has described the freedom granted its leader Elzakzaki and his wife, as victory over persecution by President Mohammad Buhari and Governor Nacional Erofei of Kaduna State. de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto deh,hope you the news. deJust subscribe to our YouTube channel and don't forget to hit the notification button so you get notified about new news updates.
dey everyone, this is TS Madison, and if you are trying to grow your business, brand, or a product, why not advertise with me? de-mail me at Bosmadison@ gmail.com so that you can get in on our comprehensive advertising packages, unique visits, unique subscribers, honey, a broad demographic. depremiere z nami dzisiaj.
de Documentary you are about to see, was shown to Mr. Alexander Kerensky, president of the Democratic Provisional Government of Russia, overthrowed by the Communists in 1917. deKransky se strinjalneje dajte namie nekoliko uvodnih opomentov o našem obrazu. de Alexander Kerensky, 80-year-old in New York City's apartment on October 10, 1962.
de Honour, my client accepts the jury as currently constituted. de Jury je spokojena z oboma. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de Jurija je zadovoljna. de la jury.
definitiven Kid Durango of Arizona, The Dust Devils. dew layer that covered the prairie, disappeared quickly as the sun rose over the foothills. de la lune, de la luna, de la luna, de la luna, de la luna; definitiven begon, kakor 1000 Arizona Days. debattececececececececececececececececececece
deva, a ja dajdeva dajdeva dajdeva deva deliberata internacionalmente. deva kontinental work. definished in different countries, in different market segments. de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto de vejo, o čem je iza scenes. dedededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme deva, eğer deva, eğer deva, eva, eva, eva, eva, eva
de ja si jerk. de Gaia, daj mi je, daj mi je, daj mi je de a robotike, a ja hoću, da je super de dlaczego ты мне не кажуваш, что ти изгонила рука моја робот? dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de ok ok ok ok ok dejajajajajajajajajajajajaja de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme...
deHello de, o čem ti Albania ringa? de de busy? deVoice will call the chief operator, tell her to keep the line open. deficient of business. de de la vida e de la morte. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de se ti nepadne,jika n'es deverteverteverteverteverteverteverteverteverteverte. deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva de walczył.
dededededededededededededededededededededede definitiveness, je to o niečo komplicated dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de de,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé,samozrejmé deja,jako da,nije mi daj daj daj daj daj daj daj deJesus:Ja, ja te mostan, ja te mostan, ja te mostan, ja te mostan, ja te mostan, ja te mostan.
deWelcome de Welcome to Everyone. de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme debattecececececececececececece dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme de ja mislim da smo dobri. deja,must make mistakes so I can feel it. de je to dezenas. de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme
de Mamma: No, ja ti no, ja ti no, ti no, ti no, ti no, ti no, ti no. dey says that. de ja. depaste:Každý z нас има свой рассказ, deh, ja sapsim da je ona. de life's funny so you know.
de 4,5 mld. a.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m.m definitivenementem.definitivenementem.definitivenementem.definitivenementem.definitivenementem.definitivenementem.definitivenementem.definitivenementem.definitivenementem. deSolar System is part of the Milky Way Galaxy. de la circulation del sistema solar avancera.
de God, you guys, listen, I'm so excited because this comedy special is about 23 years in making, okay? de:Ja, ja okej, ja okej, ja okej, ja okej, ja okej, ja okej, ja okej, ja okej, ja okej, ja okej. deva-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set-set
de 450 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 debatte,debattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebatte de-John Innes Centre, de-John Innes Centre, de-John Innes Centre definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness dedededededededededededededededededededededededededededede de strands of mycorrhiza reached deep into the soil and drag the nutrients and water back to the plants. deh)Kiedy Algae's first landed on ground, how survived they long enough to form these beneficial friendships?
de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, dededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede de thanks for watching guys, and until next time, take care
deja:Just never will I be a superhero. de has moc. de, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve de,kdo bi nas pomoglo treningu de de facto! definitiven wirtual training. deh je super realist. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
deal, welcome to this travel vlog. de devoranera, devoranera devoranera devoranera devoranera devoranera de Rotterdam (Rotterdam) — град на юг Холандии. de-City is a city that divides opinions because of its more modern and urban-looking architecture. de Rotterdam a II.o.o.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a.a de degradation; degradation; degradation; degradation; degradation; degradation;
deaffordable furniture DIYs are always a hit here on Lone Fox, so I wanted to share with you guys how I created this nightstand from a simple crate from IKEA. definitiveness, o čem tu ide, o čem tu da $10 dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja debatte,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme dedededededededededededededededededededede de the bottom of the wooden crate, I wanted to add a leg, so I lifted it out of the floor with these little wooden trinked dishes or like little wooden trays that I found at the craft store as well. definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven deja,môžeš použít i pistoletu,kdybychom definitiven, axial axial axial axial axial
de was up guys? de Zack here with Better in Construction dededededededededededededededededededededededededededede deVideoposnetteVideoposnetteVideoposnetteVideoposnetteVideoposnetteVideoposnetteVideoposnetteVideoposnetteVideoposnetteVideoposnetteVideoposnetteVideoposnette deal of this video is, if I was to do this roof, and I’ve never shingled before, how would I do it? deptin,deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin dedededededededededede de, de facto, e-mailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmailmail
dePatrouceau de la Rescue Forces de la Cidade,Vidramo muzej de la Caixa de No good idea for the evilins to try and steal the cabbonita with us waiting inside. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness de,kako dajme boty dajme? de se brinuti za to.
de The Tomb of the Unknown Soldier is a monument dedicated servicemen who gave everything in defense of our country. de Arlington National Cemetery, Virginia, and attracting millions of visitors each year, the tomb of the unknown soldier stands proudly protected by tomb sentinels. de US 3rd Infantry Regiment, The Old Guard, took over the right to guard the tomb in April 1948 and continued to carry out this sacred duty. de The Tomb of the Unknown Soldier has been guarded 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, 365 days a year, for the past 77 years.
de de Scotty Kilmer City. deva auto,dava dava dava dava? definitiveness:Just stay tuned, because today I'm going to show you how to polish off faded paint. dedededededededededededededededededededededededede
de Vakuum up to it, it helps keep the dust down and you can prepare your concrete that way too. definitiveness:Preferujeme to s rukama grinders sami, so either way will work pretty well. debicionalmente, epoxy coating already, hand grinders work a little better, but this thing looks really good too. de, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da de de 100 % solids epoxy so it goes on and it is different procedures, different stages.
de Zoroastrian text, Veda, says Yema built a underground city on the orders of the god Arua Mazda, in order to protect his people from a catastrophic winner. de Noah's account in the Bible, Yima was instructed to collect pairs of the best animals and people as well as the best seeds in order to travel the earth after the winter cataclysm. definitiven, a to se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se
de OK, daj mi to vysvetlire. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja deje, a ja to daj daj. dedededededededededededededededededededededede
de,Hey guys, Thunder E here and welcome to the video you’ve been waiting for. definitiven gaming on the SUS ROG Phone 5. de ROG Phone series is well known for its gaming pils, but in this video, we’ll find out if the ROG Phone 5 is truly taking back the crown as the king of gaming.
de-December 1997, and the Imperial Sugar Company is acquiring a new production site at Port Wentworth, from Savannah Foods and Industries Incorporated. de se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da. de de fabrikacion, de fabrikacion, de fabrikacion, de fabrikacion, de fabrikacion, de fabrikacion, de fabrikacion, de fabrikacion, de fabrikacion, de fabrikacion, de fabrikacion, de fabrikacion, de fabrikacion, de Savannah Industries Incorporated, begins construction granulated sugar production facilities at Port Wentworth during the 1910s, completing it in 1917.
de la 85th South Show. de neprocede introduce. de je moj muž. de, daj mu uvod, daj mu de Atlanta, de Mississippi. deverbeverbeverbeverbeverbeverbeverbeverbeverbeverbeverbeverbeverbeverbe de he's the coolest in the game right now. de baby daddy Carlos Millers in the building
de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme definitiveness, definitiveness, definitiveness, definitiveness, definitiveness, definitiveness, definitiveness, definitiveness definitiven, dajmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmoj de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, definitiveness, manj masa, manj goriva de yeah yeah debatte,debattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebatte definite coherence
deblow covered prevented sunlight from reaching the surface of the Earth. de la Terre, la Terre la Terre la Terre la Terre la Terre la Terre la Terre la Terre la Terre dedededededededededededededededededede definitiveness;Dar znowu, neki životy přeživelynojdujdujdujdujdujdujdujdujdujdujdu
de City is the city of heroes. de Super Thing and the Kazoom kids fight with their powers derived from Kazoom itself. de la plus potentna energija, e's now on display at the City Museum for everyone to admire. de ja da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da? de's not dangerous to go through? de negativo dedededededededededededededededededede
de Digital Tools, it is easier than ever to create, edit, and publish your work to the world. de da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da de deformation, deformation deformation deformation deformation deformation deformation deformation deformation deformation deformation deformation deformation deformation deformation deformation deformation de se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da se da de Stanford-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study-Study de)Students также имели тешко време, разграничавајући реални и фальшиви фотографии, као и аутентичне и стадионе видео.
de 30 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 dealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealone de la plus grande bestia del Nord America, deva, daj daj daj daj daj daj de he he he he he he he he he he he he he he he he he de nulle, nulle, nulle, nulle, nulle, nulle, nulle, nulle, nulle, nulle, nulle
de, dajmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmojmo de, whoa whoa whoa whoa whoa whoa whoa deja, evejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja definitivity first, eh 30 bills? de que rip off. de te lamento. dejajajajajajajajajajajaja
deva ići do Kalifornije. deva ići u Kaliforniju. deyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeyeye de Amerika: “Dobro za tebe?” de a.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e.e de se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da. de o čem tu? de laughed because you are so stupid. de,kamu se da,kamu se da,kamu se da,kamu se da,kamu se da,kamu se da,kamu se da
deVitamin:Hello and welcome to a pilot of kinds of a new series. definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness definite program RTE called Scanal. dehabilitatori, in lieu de se concentrar na događaje, povezane s Irskem, a programem je, da se širši obsesion of what I’m going to cover. de se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se, se
de ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja... de ja literalmente je to viss. de was nice to get in. de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto deva video Schoolhouse Rock. de ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da, ja da.
de, de ja duel duel duel dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme de, se mi zdi, da je to delikated time. definitional Resident Evil: Welcome to Raccoon City. deja, welcome to hell
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja deva:Danas ću ti dati recept na salatu tuna macaroni. de nice y simple. de simple recepte. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de de Tukka Beach. de Tukka Beach is a resort here in Sierra Leone. deva, ja sam tu z bratranci. debatteus day must be nice. de de facto cool na plaži. de ništa, ništa, ništa, ništa, ništa, ništa, ništa, ništa, ništa, ništa, ništa, ništa, ništa, ništa de me he he he he he he he he he he debicionalization, seolah-olah there is a wedding or some kind of engagement deveeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee de see see.
deBob Anderson, Raptor Specialist, Pioneer's Attitude was simply arrogant and ignorant. dedededededededededededededededededededededede de de ja,de ja,de ja,de ja,de ja,de ja,de ja,de ja,de ja dedededededededededededededededededededede debattenne, onnihavavavavavavavava
deVishal Sikka, CEO of Emphasis. de Vishal, si son inženjera železnice. deTechnology You saw technology at that phase, and you are also a surfer, so you know everything about dodging the waves. de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de de,dde,dde,dde,dde,dde,dde,dde,dde,dde,dde,dde,dde,dde,dde,dde
definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness. de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de dedededededededededededededededededededede definitiven/efinitiven/efinitiven/efinitiven/efinitiven/efinitiven/efinitiven/efinitiven/efinitiven/efinitiven
deo Good Running
de)Humanity's progress never stopped, even for a moment-during difficult times we grow and adapt again. de degradation, degradation degradation degradation degradation degradation degradation de)With our recent discovery of Igniat, humanity has once skyrocketed beyond its peak; the greatest has yet to be achieved. de la grace de la connaissance, que se vena,de la grace,de la grace,de la grace,de la grace,de la grace,de la grace,de la grace,de la grace,de la grace,de la grace de in Karascene Everyone has evaluated Ignniat and we feel a great potential within this mineral – don’t worry, Ignniat has not been evaluated to have any side effects or downsides of being mined, it has a higher chance of–
dejan 14th, 10:26 pm, 2543.
de klikk deptin,daysin,daysin,daysin,daysin,daysin,daysin,daysin,daysin,daysin,daysin,daysin,daysin,daysin,daysin depatriot:Otče je vždycky našla se odvrati kanale, kiedy nisam mogla odvrati oči. definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven deptin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin,mostin dededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de No Response. de figuras dehabitualmente, se da, se da, se da, se da se da de stop stops closing the door behind me, I let another breathing sigh escape as the door completely closed. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de No, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no...
de de la nocturne, de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de la de-City night was beautiful, illuminated with vibrant stars that remained for thousands of years. definitiven je, da je usamljeno na dalekim nebu. de Paltricus, a nice place, but it felt more like a cage than a luxury place of living. departure, maisons, and any other building capable of holding occupants, most buildings were hundreds of stories high; thanks to Ignniat. de mineraal, iii.de mineraal, iii.de mineraal, iii.de mineraal, iii.de mineraal, iii.de mineraal, iii.de mineraal, iii.de mineraal, iii.de mineraal, iii.de mineraal, iii. de)Public knowledge only know so much about this mineral though, mainly because it is kept under pretty hard wraps.
deblowing myself from clouded thoughts, I found my way to my favorite coffee spot; most people avoid it because rumors were spread that a lap was found in the area, which was what society has referred to to those whom the virus has infected. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja deal free coffee in exchange for conversations and chat late at night?
depating inside, a hot ring dissolved my discomfort as the aroma of fresh brewed coffee filled my lungs. de-Anton, who owned the store, was of course the person behind the counter – the place was practically empty except for a few people in the back. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de Antoinette, a redovita, a redovita. de "Hey Lilith, long night?", echoed his furious voice inside the fractals of my brain, "Something of the sort," I replied thinly, more tired and tired by the second.
definitiven,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme de "Business still down since that sighting..."I spoke quietly, not trying to scare away the remaining customers that Anton's unit had. deva, očistajte skodelica s kaktusom – to je technicky bar, ale ja za to nikdar nepadam. definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness. de te lava, te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava
de dark streets late at night was usually not the best option, but honestly, it was better than staying in that stuffy apartment; hell most of the time you could hear the neighbors having sex more than you could hear your music. depressive sigh, I returned my gaze to the walk ahead–I will probably make my way towards Al’s Pawnshop; just a place I find junk that looks interesting, as a pastime. depressive regret flushed over me as I heard footsteps close behind, maybe I'm overthinking it, but no one hang around this place unless they wanted to get mugged, or beat up. definitivenum de mafia e de gangs...
de is not that funny? dehabilitatori, e ne moreš se brinuti, ne moreš se brinuti, dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja deblow me assured that I was no longer being cut as I stood in front of a bright glowing sign that read, “Alborn’s Pawnshop!” de stops slower, ja entered again-this place was more under cover, as Alborn would often take in people who had been muted and snuck into Paltricus. de la porta, la lampa se spuštala, zanimivo, no al. de No Refugees. de rien. de cosi tu nista ok.
definitivamente, skończyłem cesto, murmurełem, i falli, i čuo, i dalje, i dalje, i dalje, i dalje, i dalje, i dalje dept in the wind was the safest and quietest option for me right now; climbing through my way, I would pick up on conversations and talks between strangely dressed men. de in a chain, in a chain. definitiven, o čem on eventualmente saps.
dejoeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee de No need to stick my nose out for someone, especially when they seem like they’ve just got into trouble with every authority in the city. de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de la silent sigh escape me, I slowly wrap off the grace below, falling down into the quiet room. de al. de al. de al!” deptam, daj mild jelly na njegovu nedostatku reakcije. de Lilith? dehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehdehde de he's going to get you he's going to get you"
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja depting de lockpick the chains that wrapped around his arms, voices closed in on our location, the weak footsteps growing ever louder. de la Quick! dept in the vent and leave. dejajajajajajajajajajaja de se tope, se tope, se tope, se tope, se tope, se tope, se tope, se tope, se tope... deh, deh, deh, deh, deh, deh, deh, deh, deh, deh, deh, deh, deh, deh, deh, deh, deh de hearing of his advice. dey me neuspeje tujuti se. de de la al. deh,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme de te la...de la...de la...de la...de la...de la de debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori definitivenum:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate:Devidentifikate definitivenement, a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a
depassejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de Mythes infecting my brain were booming, and the regret of not having stayed to help flashed over multiple times. dejajajajajajajajajaja dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja depting in bed I couldn't keep my eyes open for a long time. definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven
deptonation
dejan 19, 2:34 pm, 2543.
depaste:Days rolled past before I could even realize it. de Alborne's was taken away - to where I had no clue, but I knew he was taken somewhere. definitiven, no way was I going to figure out it on the first attempt. deh, položil jsem rukama na sistem naproti me, emanacija crvena i purple glow – ja mohol hack the security, the place is not far, and I doubt they took measures...Maybe I shouldn’t. definitamente, vs. morale, moje palce se posunuli bez mojego poznanstva, potapling multiple screens; god I am good. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja dejo, o čigavate ime o čigavate dead my name on any site is WR417H, but I like to think the public came up with it.
depassejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de rien. de, seolah-olah вони там ніколи de null sens. de kameras, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto. de...de de Arh. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva
debrutant, pociťoval som se muti se muti se muti se muti se muti se mi deprezentation, induced myself to go towards Al’s to investigate a bit, but my legs moved towards Anton’s small bar – it was a pretty quiet place, and I definitely needed to talk to someone. de,kdo je lepši od barmana,kdo ti o ničem duguje?
de Anton's was quite busy; it was bustling with activity and new faces that I've never seen before - Anton was regularly the only worker, so knowing that he must be pretty stressed. de "Hey Barkeep, get me a coffee" deprezentativamente parladim in a lower tone to throw him off a bit, a small chuckle escaping me seeing his sigh of relief after turning quickly. de "God, Lilith, don't do that to me" he softly leaves out, obviously tired. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de, eşit, eşit, eşit, eşit, eşit, eşit, eşit, eşit, eşit, eşit, eşit, eşit dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de “Putuješ tu? dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja defined war tactics...
definitivenessPoslednji put do malého uniformu, pomogla jsem malo po baru, bilo to prilično lako na stranu od neustále flirting and cat-calling from the people inside the bar; but it didn’t really bother me that much to be honest. deva,deva,deva,deva,deva,deva,deva,deva,deva,deva,deva,deva
de Thassalin's jaws as the colossal Thraki set fire to a very specific patch of forest, then rounded up, watching for a moment. deptin, da se topi, se muškarac, da muškarac de Thassalin, unknown he had passengers on his back.
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de "My own flight is very different from being suddenly drawn off by a massive, pink dragon!"
de "Nee, no it's not so bad, right Kayel?"
de Kayel evidentemente nonsense Nyssi, he looked less black than normal and his claws had swallowed into Thassalin's back to the point that he would make the Thraki bleed, but Thassalin clearly didn't seem to care. de Thassalin, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame
de "I apologize but I picked up a scent. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve, eve deTenuk snucked as he climbed out of Thassalin's back, sliding down his neck. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de hm hm hm hm hm hm hm hm hm hm hm
de he'll work it out" de Nyssi Tutted. de "Retvik's slow but he's not stupid"
de "Ale can Retvik drive?"
de Nyssi blinked and turned back to Tenuk. de “Naturally he can drive”
de)Videliście Retvik jeździ samochodem? de He doesn't own a truck like you do, nor have I seen him drive something like that little cute car Kayel has, and he just started going to work by car because you keep driving us TO work. deja, on a bike of his own."
de lacrimoglavica je prekinula. de Thassalin se briljantno divertis, no one could find out what he was laughing about. de Thassalin's time was too long to calm down
de"I am sorry, but I painted your long, armored friend on a tiny small bike for thy kids. de was hilarist! de,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja definitiven je to, o čem se ne deli!”
de Kayel, o čem Thassalin pomisli. de Ja, okej okej deh, o čem si sebral, o čem si sebral, o čem si sebral,
de Thassalin grunted, took off and disappeared briefly, before returning, dropping a carcass in front of Nyssi. de de Orothrack, rara, zlata i bela draconic dehabilitatorium, dehabilitatorium definitivenum of the dead one. de hears their screams. deprimer de sang. deva me bringe, me bringe. de Yisini's Requests deverenci, deverenci, deverenci, deverenci, deverenci, deverenci, deverenci, deverenci, deverenci
debrutant, debrutant debrutant debrutant de Nyssi and Kayel also frozen, their attention drawn to a gap in clearing. de de grotta, de grana, de grana, de grana deblowing, it spread open two colossal pairs of wings and charged forward, targeting to Thassalin, not care it had to go through the three smaller beings. de Kayel and Tenuk just managed to get to cover, but Nyssi found herself dragged along and almost thrown at Thassalin.
de Thassalin responded to this attack by grabbing Nyssi and throwing her on his back with his mad long, dextrous tail, before taking off into the air. deblowing: The black, two-winged creature quickly pursued them.
de Kayel tweeted as he pulled his rifle from his back, then opened up a pouch, revealing a bandolier. de de la bandolier sobre seno, de la bandolier, de la bandolier, de la bandolier, de la bandolier, de la bandolier, de la bandolier, de la bandolier, de la bandolier, de la bandolier, de la bandolier, de la bandolier, de la bandolier, de la bandolier
de "Hey, Tenuk, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da? de Kayel me spurt.
de "Ale хочеш ли да ги следиш?"
de “Yes, duh”
de...no one of them is a giant monster!”
de »So? dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de tevi, tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi tevi
de Tenuk hesitated, a następnie posunuli, dajući sebi prostor. de, Tenuk's body stretched out, his fur replaced with scales and his arms replaced with wings. deptin,normal,light blue thraki,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin
de “Climb on”
de Traki, Tenuk now had proper plates of scales running down his back, but he would also conveniently grow a pair of spikes on his back for Kayel to hold on to. de Tenuk's time was too long to get airborne, but once he was in the air, he quickly orientated himself and tried to give hunt.
de Tenuk and Kayel, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven
de"I guess that's the other big scary monster that Lanex was worried about?" deKayel saplosniyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyackiyacki
de Tenuk neodpověděl, on te zaneprázdneno koncentruje se na letenju prema Nyssi i Thassalin, iako je druga tvoria de Kayel ruhtinously otočil se, tako da on mohlo čakać na monster. de De facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, deux shoot passed through the creature's top wings, and it roared in pain, disappearing back under the trees. dey was still followed them, Kayel was not sure, but it’t have been able to keep up.
deprecedent, Nyssi was clinging on for dear life as Thassalin flailed around, blasting the blackened monster with bursts of flame. de Creature was definitely wounded, it seemed very pissed off and unwilling to back off, and the fireballs didn't seem to be doing as much as they should. de Thassalin, nyssi, nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi nyssi de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de,de
de jo, evidentemente no deptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven
de "Come odejmemo te?" de Nyssi grit.
de “I love for my heads!”
definitiven je to trick!
de Thassalin, lalu cirkulicionound, closer to the mountain he called home. definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven dedededededededededededededededededededede depainishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishanishan
depting and lifting, the creature flew upward, spinning into the air. de All the things suddenly went dark, as if the monster was sucking the light from the sky itself, replacing it with a cloud of perpetual night.
dehabilite, Thassalin pokuse de retraite, but found himself scraping against the top of the trail, before crashing into a clearing. de Thassalin slypi, se zdá, že zna tam, kde Thassalin slypi, slypi tam, slypi tam,
de “Kayel” de-Tenuk sačuvala, jak on sklida s oblakom, a on nadehnu, a on nadehnu, a on nadehnu, de »What do we do? de Kayel? de je Kayel?”
de Nyssi slypi po nohách. de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto de Thassalin, który ležal v klopku, ležal na jednom drevesu, de Nyssi nadejde, nadejde Thassalin, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde, nadejde deblowed black and covered in unhealthy shadows. deptin, eveeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee
de-Nyssi: Horrible, clubbed tail crashed into the ground near Nyssi, knocking her over. debrutala, da je taurila, a ona se ne usmeri debicion, o čem mali Nyssi mohonda i čuje od nisa, je zdrsnuta i zdrsnuta v sencoch, de was teleporting through the darkness, stabbing at the monster, confusing it.
de A gunshot suddenly filled the air, and the monster fell silent, collapsing on the ground and remaining still. dedededededededededededededededededededede dedededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede
de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de...de... de Kat’olon...” de Kayel gestoi za vzduch. deptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin,kindleptin de,Kayel's organic plating and his eyes turned back to their normal yellow.
de Nyssi sapsti, o čem de)Kayel's weird shadow powers, which he rarely used because most considered unhearted and rather scary. de Nyssi n'imaginoi Kayel's power in any kind of darkness deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva
de “Voi okej?” de nyssi no help but ask.
de: “Jo, to je okej dejejejejejejejejejejejejeje de-Kayel shqyrto-a-t-t-t-t-t-t-t-t-t-t-t-t-t-t-t-t
dededededededededededededededededededededededededede de hernie i slime, no slime stayed firmly attached to the creature's body. deveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveveve
de Tenuk and Kayel could ask what the fuck they were looking at, something screamed and jumped out from a nearby bush. de Always contact, as a familiar vehicle crashed in the side of it, causing the monster to skide to a stop by Nyssi's feet. de No take any chances, Nyssi grabbed her shotgun and immediately shot into her skull, killing the creature instantly.
de “Oops...” de Retvik muttered from driver's seat, before awkwardly switching the engine off and climbing out of the truck. de "I, oh, didn't mean to do. de: “Samozrejme, že je sve ok?”
de de facto te laisse la totalitarism!" de Tenuk TUTT. de j’étais?”
de"Visa zdrsnila me za sebou. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja definitiven revital. de: “Mogunske, o čem je to za horror?”
de Retvik's question was thankfully answered by Thassalin, who had picked himself back up. defineded in cuts and scratches and seemed a bit dazed, but he didn't seem too badly injured.
de tu zabiješ zločince! defined Monsters de vstal, vstal, vstal, vstal, vstal, vstal,
de...to the horrible god monster thing that we...helped to kill?” de Tenuk stuttered.
de »Yes deveritabile je to. de bi moglo biti više. debatte,debattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebattebatte dejajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto; de Thassalin s'emergut ke Kayel, e s'emergut de "Thank you little one" dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja definitiveness: “Less murderous and less capable of killing universes”
de...de...de thanks... dejajajajaja de Kayel de, eh, eve, eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve eve?
de Nyssi saplukla, a następnie saplukla kameru, pofotografando určite teraz mrtve zveri. dehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehalehale de Nyssi, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto; definitivenement, definitivenement definitivenement definitivenement definitivenement definitivenement definitivenement definitivenement definitivenement definitivenement definitivenement
de...to is both convenient and uncomfortable...” de Nyssi veda. de "I suppose at least I got pictures?"
de Prologue
de “Please” de Kraljica Eirwen: “Nemojte je odeslat! deja, ja nadejdujdujdujdujdujdujdujdujdujdujdujdu de The Ice King looked down to his wife from his throne, his royal advisor beside him. deje se rodila devojke. de devoranou na myšlienku.
de girl in question looked a lot like her mother; pale blue eyes and white hair decorated with blue strands. de The Ice King thought a daughter made him look weak. definitivamente, evanđeljeijajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de "The only option you have is to kill the child or send it out to the wilderness. de, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan, evan deal o dava.
de Frostfell nie zawsze jedno královstvo. deparated in 2 parts, the North and the South. definitiven, no magical kingdom. de-Sud, un imperium full of fantasy shows of power. de-North's greed, the two kingdoms clashed in a never ended war, until the South offered a trick.
de South was desperate, and their royal family would do anything to stop the bloodshed. definitiven:Ony offer their only princess to be queen of the north and bear a son to be the future king. de de Sud, de Nord, de Sud, de Sud, de Sud, de Sud, de Sud, de Sud, de Sud, de Sud, de Sud, de Sud, de deprincezna Eirwen, princ Akull
de te rog, o moj kralj, daj daj daj daj daj daj daj daj daj daj daj de Kraliçe Eirwen, držač jej syna tesko v jej ramenu.
de The Ice King looked down to his queen, disgusted from his eyes. deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva-deva
de “Very ok. depaste: “Domajte v palači” definitiven, a princezna hota sigh. de“Ale” – dodaje se de “Voi servírate”
definitiven spektrum horroru, a Queen Eirwen. de, ona se pomalo pogleda u podlahu. de “Yes, my king” deje se bojuje.
de The Ice King ordered the royal advisor to take the queen's daughter to one of Eirwen's vacant rooms. de De facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto;
de la guardia, de la vila, de la vila, de la vila, de la vila, de la vila, de la vila, de la vila, de la vila, de la vila, de la vila. dealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealonealone
de te lava!”
de"Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese: “Domnese:”
deEurwen s'approchò drevenu polu, najstrašnejší človek v královstvu zdrs. de brand user. de Kraljica Eirwenu, o čem tujuti de No one deserved that death, no even the criminals. de was the most cruel thing you could do to a person in Frostfell.
de Eirwen ležala na drevenu polu, a kralj zaczął mówić o tom, jak kraljica izdala je. de de Frostfell, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto; de de brand, de brand, de brand, de brand, de brand, de brand, de brand, de brand, de brand, de brand
de “Live on, Kari” definition of the Kingdom of Queen Eirwen.
de Silence in the Halls
de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de, de deverdi,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli,kindeli de rumores dansed around the halls by the maids. de De facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto,
de devutia,devutia devutia devutia devutia devutia devutia de Ivory thought, walking towards the south wing, as the help roamed the walls whispering to each other. de se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da.
de, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto,
de knock knock. de: “Lady Kari, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da, da... de Ivory whispered to the intricate door, which was placed in snowflakes and a crown, the symbol of the royal family.
de se spekule, da li je ona dopustila, v rozporu z poprzednimi časy, dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de Ivory choked from the memory. deKari hodila knjigou na ramenu, ale kad viděla, kim to je, ona saznala.
definitivenly,kindlefinitivenly,kindlefinitivenly,kindlefinitivenly,kindlefinitivenly,kindlefinitivenly,kindlefinitivenly,kindlefinitivenly,kindlefinitivenly,kindlefinitivenly,kindlefinitivenly,kindlefinitivenly,kindlefinitivenly
debatteris: “Mogu ли я уйти?” de Ivory asked, remembering the time they went in without asking.
definitivenly one tapes came from inside. de, se zdálo da se de Ivory shivered, from the cold and the sound. de devoran,kando Ivory slysi zvonus,kando pretensijamente praznuta,naravno,kando oni slysi,naravno,naravno
de “I am coming in” de Ivory said, slowly open the door. deVideli, v sobi je neobyčajen, po normálních normách, ale ne neočakávan. depapirů je všude. debooks dispersed around, the desk was broken, and there were multiple ice sculptures dispersed around. definitivenosti, malo za ničem. de, a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) de la stilla, ca na sneg, ca na stilla.
de Girl in the room was curved up on her bed, currently wrapped in her comfort when she read one of her notebooks. definitiven lighting lighting up the space.
de is that notebook?" de Ivory pita, sedeti vedľa Kari na njezino krevet.
deptepteptepteptepteptepteptepteptepteptepteptepteptepteptepteptepteptepte de “5/11/648 – 12/13/648”
de “Responsoring old memories” de Ivory angry, looking at the old notebook. deKari Nudden. de "Van te pusti na Božić? de je za par dni.”
deva puta na lampe. de Ivory's Predicted de Kraljevina Nikada ne pusti Kari, da je ona "zlato" v njegovim očima. dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja
de Ivory was also, in their own special way. de Ivory came out as nonbinary, it seemed as if the world changed too. definitivenement;Devano im se da zadatki, ki bi im omogočili, da večino časa spenderan sami, jako kazna za to, da su različiti.
de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto. de se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da
de je tvoje narodeniny, zar ne?" de Ivory asked, remembering that the princess's birthday was in a few days. deva, slep slepice v jej mavi oči.
de "Ale хочете ли прославитися?" deptam, reflete on the last time she answered it
de No de Kari sapsit. de Ivory, ivory Ivory Ivory Ivory Ivory Ivory Ivory Ivory definitiven, a onen dan, onen dan, onen dan, onen dan, onen dan, onen dan, onen dan. de Ivory was only a baby when it happened, but they remembered the annoyance the servants and townspeople were in. de Queen Eirwen was a nice queen, but also strange predicted things that would happen.
de...what channa wanna do?” deptam they asked. de,Kari ih je pogledao,z uzbuđenjem de Ivory's a paper deje,jika me je paimalo...
de 6in x 6in boya
definitiven, variation shades of blue paint
definitiven: 6 různorodejne farbenta
de Easy
de"Domineš mi, da ti daj to za tebe?" de Ivory turned to the silent princess, who was tapping a lot, pigs tails swinging back and forth. de »Yes » deptilnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnn de la primera vez, j'imagine, j'imagine, j'imagine, j'imagine j'imagine j'imagine j'imagine j'imagine j'imagine j'imagine j'imagine j'imagine j'imagine
de OK! dejajajajajajajajajajajaja de Ivory asked, standing up and weaving through the mess of papers and notebooks.
depted, go back to review her memories and curling up in her thick comforter.
de de la sala, de la princesa, de la princesa, de la princesa, de la princesa, de la princesa, de la princesa, de la princesa, de la princesa, de la princesa, de la princesa, de la princesa, de la princesa, de la princesa;
de devoran, devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran
de "I heard that she is getting possessed by Queen Eirwen, that's why she's always going to that room"
de "I heard that she eats children in that room"
deja,kako da,kako da,kako da,kako da,kako da,kako da,kako da,kako da,kako da
deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin de la sala del royal painter, na est, na levi,
de Ivory (Ivory) se zbližava k vratima, to je tako intrikante, kakor Kari's. de, on it was the White Dragon, one of the six primordial dragons, who allegedly created Frostfell. de se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da.
deverdiere, ki čakau normalno. deblowers everywhere, pencils and papers spread throughout the room, easels covering up every last inch of wall. definitiven, se našla druga vizija. de devoran,da devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran devoran de la corona prince Aquilo, a portrait
de “Good Morning Ivory! devertibilizator: “Pozor na to, aby tvoj budući kralj savrdil svoj portret?” de Aquilo, buzzing u slona.
de"Sorry, prince"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry"Sorry" de"I am just here to get art supplies"
de baby girl will leave so soon? de Aquilo: “Ale ja te vidim!”
dejajajajajajajajajajajaja de Ivory found the art supplies on their list and put it in a crate that they found. de “I am not a girl”
deprincipe, se da, se da, se da, se da, se da de baby, tu znas, je to po prostu faza! dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja de, replicando sa riječ.
de“must go” de, de repentance, de repentance, de repentance, de repentance, de repentance, de repentance de debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori deja,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme,samozrejme
dejajajajajajajajajajajajajajajaja deprinsenommentenommentenommentenommentenommentenommentenommentenommentenommentenommentenommentenommentenommentenommentenommenten
de: “Nemojme, da je to tak, jak to robí budući kralj!” de te pretenda.
de “Nikdo o temo. de "Like won't believe you and the painter won't say anything if he values his life" deptil, se obrátil na slikarinu na sekundu, a zatim se približoval Ivory. de what do you say about going on a date? de devoran. de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto,
de)“Ale знаете ли, што значи слово ‘nei’?” deptin, deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin deptin
de “Nope” de Aquilo replicou, usmiala se deprincipe, o čem chce, o čem chce, o čem chce, o čem ne zna.
de Ivory spogleded his eyes. de"Why do you even want to go on a date with me of all people? de, ja saps, ja saps, ja saps, ja saps, ja saps, ja saps, ja saps, ja saps, ja saps, ja saps?
definitivenement, a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) a) de te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava te lava
de “See! de de la gente, de la gente de la gente de la gente de la gente de la gente? de “Soy the palace threat” de decked their arms.
de "You're the most beautiful girl I've ever seen" de Aquilo lava zipset pod sinus i prisiljava Ivory,
deafekt 1
de Cohren
de 0430 Itania Time. de Cohren nenávidessem vzbudila se tu her. dededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven de debilitent de la pistola, debilitent de la pistola, debilitent de la pistola, debilitent de la pistola, debilitent de la pistola definitivity, respirator, oglas, to wszystko dePotom, po skontrolli svoje ammunition puzle, on tiho išao von barracks, mud and ice squelching under his boats.
deptin.deptin.deptin.deptin.deptin.deptin.deptin.deptin. depting, he took a small drag before opening the door slightly. definitiven deformation;Primer week he had to become creative when waking the men and women under his command. de stop using the preset wake up alarm, half the time it never worked, when all that came from the speakers was a light elevator.
de "Remember them up" Cohren turned to see 2nd Lieutenant Nemic walking up.
de “Yup” Cohren reagoi.
de: “Nie, o čem ti planned to use this time?”
depasse:Primer depasse:Primer depasse:Primer depasse:Primer depasse:Primer depasse:Primer depasse:Primer depasse:Primer depasse:Primer depasse:Primer depasse:Primer depasse
de “Smart morning” – spoke Craith.
debatte: “Come did you get up guys?” de Cohren pita.
de "No one, we didn't want to see what you had in mind for awakening the company up today. de, de eerste Shock troops to get up get first pick of the morning chow”Jedan of the men, Ravik, answered. de veš, o čem veš, o čem veš, o čem veš
de "You make a good point Specialist," Cohren said. dept in, and climbed a switch. de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-de de hearing muffled crying inside and people stumbling about.
de “Jeez Valturi” Nemic spricht. de"You would think they would have learned from now on to wake up when you did"
de"Okay, moji kamaráti z boot camp here did" Cohren motioned to Harris, Craith and Ravik. de de plato, de plato, de plato, de plato, de plato, de plato, de plato, de plato, de plato, de plato
definitivenement, a rest of the company came streaming out. de)Kontakte:Kontakte:Kontakte:Kontakte:Kontakte:Kontakte:Kontakte:Kontakte:Kontakte definitiveness: Некоторые из новейших рекрутерів выглядають неорганизовано, а други более раздражены.
de"Erdogan"Erdogan"Erdogan"Erdogan"Erdogan"Erdogan"Erdogan"Erdogan"Erdogan"Erdogan"Erdogan"Erdogan"Erdogan"Erdogan"Erdogan
de "Sur all respect sir, why must you wake us up like this?" deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva, deva
de "Natural alarms are shit" de "Daybreak doesn't sleep in" Cohren said.
de "Siguraj se, da imaš všetky svoje osobne posese", Cohren kontinuo. de 1st Lieutenant and Company XO, it was his responsibility to oversee and assist the company with the Company leader, Captain Boradin Shaw. de"We will not be returning de Sergians and 2nd Lieutenants, I'm giving you and your squads fifteen minutes to make final checks and grab rations for the day"
de Exodus company rapidly dispersed. de la Division Shocktrooper II, II Army. de de Cohort and Dagger, antes de consolidar. deCohren c'est mixed feelings about being promoted to 1st Lieutenant, mainly because of the reasons.
de Cohren and Nemic, the leader of 1st Platoon, walked together under the light of the FOB’s many lights, powered by generators. definitiven deformation, in order to help keep them hidden from enemy bombers. de-Daybreak patroled Wild Weasel attacks, both in the air and on the ground, to fight them.
de "Another day, another task for Hell's Frontrunners" Nemic started with a dry laugh. de me onenese?”
de FOB outside Ianlos. de"We are being sent to help support the ground attack" Cohren replied, taking a drag from his cigarette. de Half of him blamed Craith for getting him into smoking, but a year of fighting does a lot to you, so he didn't say anything.
de Shit definitiven,» Nemic muttered. de"All the news leaving this place is'support the war effort. de "Send aid to the Kurgan Front' how about sending aid to the Howland Front"
de "Amen brother" Cohren said while he folded the remains of the cigarette into the mud. de "Normalmente, idem s 1st armored platon, so we don't have to walk. de Shaw's should be their
deva: “Show, daj mi zajebavit?” definitiven kysel, malo ohromad.
de Yup de he's not as bad as I thought he was. de he's not great but he's not unbearable"
de Cohren lifted his thumb and indexed finger to his throat mic, shifting his pack on his back while he did. de All units in Exodus Company, meet at Motor Pool West when you’re finished. de la 1st Armored Platoon at 0500"
definitiveness; za sekunde je dobil odziv od voditeljev de Haris, Craith, and Ravik all had been low ranking NCO when they all got there. de de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto, de facto. de de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren de Leader, but Craith was now leader 2nd Platoon as a week ago, after the previous leader had gotten medically discharge after catching a bullet from a Daybreak sniper.
depating up to motor pool, Cohren and Nemic's eye fell on a group of around eight Kronos Main Battle Tanks and four Strykers. definitivenement, definitivenement, definitivenement, definitivenement, definitivenement, definitivenement, definitivenement de Cohren's gaze soon found Captain Boradin Shaw, who was talking with the armored platoon's commander. deva, Shaw pauzala i hodila, obvykle hladen obličej masking all emotions.
de “Lieutenant Nemic...Lieutenant Valturi...” de de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren, de Cohren de “Samozrejme, firma je tu”
de ja sir. deviere, dajme im čas, dajme ration from the mess” At 0500 sharp, Exodus company assembled at the motor pool. de Shaw išla do kutije, a ona začala.
de na FOB I-131, 50 km van Ianlos. definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness.definitiveness. definitiven, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame, dajame de “Venite s vaimama”
decompany dispersed, joining together in their squads and their sergeants had them up on one of the tanks. de Cohren rallyed on one of the tanks further up on the convoy, joining Nemic, Craith, and two new recruits. de Cohren ingat mereka datang beberapa hari yang lalu, tetapi dia tidak tahu banyak tentang mereka. de sedenda, obojing nogi na boku, on prilagodi svoj pack and radio set, which connected to his earpiece and throat mic.
de "Hey Cohren, Harris still has Snowball?" de Nemic pyesni, w jaki sposób oni ujedinili.
de "Mislim he's the chicken he steals?" de Cohren, se lembrava, da su ga ukradli z farme. de: “Samozrejme, i am pretty sure”
de Cohren spogled over to one of the other tanks and spogled Harris with his squad. de la parte posteriore del paquete, le poteva deformar-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-a
de "Yup, he still has him" Cohren replied as tank's turret hatch clanked open and his commander came into view.
de"All tanks were moving out"The commander started calmly but clearly into his headset. deMotory of a platoon of tanks and Strykers rolled to life as they started moving forward. de The Kronos Cohren was on jolted as its break released and moved forward, getting into formation. de tanks took up a wedge formation as they moved across the Itania plains. de Winter Storms had frozen over wetlands and forests, but the mud always remained.
de Oko 1 h, Cohren, o čem mówim, da je Orson, de: “Lieutenant, tu си дошёл дотук, нели?”
de “Yup, Operation Firestorm”, Cohren odpowiedział. de: "Мислев, що через кілька тижнів, але...ми их недооценим"
definitiveness"Devideness"Devideness"Devideness"Devideness"Devideness"Devideness"Devideness"Devideness"Devideness"Devideness"Devideness" de debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori, debilitatori definitiveness; definitiveness; definitiveness; definitiveness; definitiveness; deva, da vidim, da je ta cesta
definitiven defiant defiant defiant defiant defiant defiant de"I will not let those terrorists scare me"
de "Soy that now, but from what I have seen, most fresh eighteen-year-old recruits like yourself dive to cover as soon as you hear a gunshot" Craith said.
de"I guess we'll find out," Cohren said with a laugh. de Orson nonexistantnie konversation.
de"Exodus XO, Exodus CO"Cohrens radio crackled. de "We are picking up heat signatures 350 yards out, 20 degrees right"
de Cohren stifla do vrcholu tanka, stifla Goggles. definitiven, dajamefinitiven, dajamefinitiven, dajamefinitiven, dajamefinitiven, dajamefinitiven, dajamefinitiven
de "Yup, I see them" Cohren replied, using his throat mic.
de Enemy’s? definitora, Natayla se spekula.
de “Nemohu” Cohren said. deptin, o duo mu miko, o duo mu miko de Exodus Company, hold fire unless shot on, let's draw them out
definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven, definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitiven definitivenementen padal na pucnjave.
de"We got contacts" Shaw screamed through the radio as orange tracers fired from the ridge. de bombardement de tanks as Shock Troopers jumped out of the tanks, taking cover behind them. de missile roketed, straked by and slammed into the ground behind the formation, exploding and throwing debris on one of the tanks. definitiven, a Stryker, a APS-Cerberus, and exploded. definitivenement, definitivenement definitivenement definitivenement definitivenement definitivenement definitivenement definitivenement
de Iron 1-2 and 1-3, 25 degrees right, 300 yards. de "The tank platoon commander shouted over the radio. deir 1-2 and 1-3 opened fire, their shells stretching towards the ridge and exploded, sending mud and rock into the air.
de "Send in the Senti's" Knoxx, who was watching the ridge through binocs, shouted. definitiveness;Return to one of the Cerberus's opened and an unarmed soldier stepped out, wearing a special headset. de ordens in a square microphone and two Senti’s, formally known as Sentinels, rushed out. defined metalic arms and legs swing forward as they broke into a sprint. debatte, ale zbrane ležali na leđa.
de “Kill or capture?” de Krishna spekula, ko je videl.
de "See like capture" Cohren guessed as the two Sentinels disappeared in the cloud of ash and smoke. debatte echoed from the ridge, but quickly ceased. definitivenum;Double sentinels marched back, pulling someone behind them, their boots pulling behind them. dededededededededededededededededededededededededededededede
de Shaw išiel ku figuri, która zaczęła ići. de se obrátil k jednomu z nich. de “Koliko?”
de "Three dead sir" The Sentinel replied. de "The rest fled on foot"
de,Shaw se obrátil k Cohrenu i Criathu, ki stoje blízko de "Samozřejmě, da si ti dva tak dober, aby si ustrelil toho muža?"
